I decided to make a set of 4x4 cards. One of the houses next to us has just sold so I will be adding these to a little goodie basket to give to the new owners when they move in.
...it was as if the two of us had been living in parallel passageways or tunnels, never knowing that we were moving side by side, like souls in like times, finally to meet at the end of those passageways before a scene I had painted as a kind of key meant for her alone, as a kind of secret sign that I was there ahead of her and that the passageways finally had joined and the hour for our meeting had come...What a stupid illusion that had been! No, the passageways were still parallel, as they always had been, only now the wall separating them was like a glass wall, and I could see Maria, a silent and untouchable figure...No, even that wall was not always glass; at times it again became black stone, and then I did not know what was happening on the other side...I was even convinced that during those moments...the whole story of the passageways was my own ridiculous invention, and that after all there was only one tunnel, dark and solitary: mine, the tunnel in which I had spent my childhood, my youth, my entire life. And in one of those transparent sections of the stone wall I had seen this girl and had naively believed that she was moving in a tunnel parallel to mine, when in fact she belonged to the wide world...
So yeah, this is what I'm obsessing about right now & probably will continue to be for the next month. Thanks to all of my friends who are patiently answering my never-ending stream of questions about what concealer they wear & how often they use their Clarisonic.
Did it happen that Christmas we remember in jest?
“We hate Jesus here,” the terrorist stated, moving toward the pastor.
sometimes, i really, really, really hate technology.
- he eats pretty good.. not a big brancher outter
The same applies to our bodies. I sometimes have neck, shoulder, arm and hand problems
And there we come to my one major reservation about this book. God exists in this universe, as does the Devil. We're even told the Devil was kicked out of heaven in something resembling the standard Miltonian version of events. All fine and good -- I have no problem with fantasy that assumes Christian myths are true anymore than I have a problem that involves Greek or Norse gods. But then this story does involve Greek and Norse gods -- and suddenly we're facing the Xena Problem: how do you reconcile these incompatible mythos?
The Taft Building, 6280 Hollywood Blvd (at Vine Street), Hollywood, CA
It was a long day and I got tired and, as I say, chilled by being outdoors in the cold when I wasn't used to it. I can't imagine those poor people having to bear up in it while they are living in those flimsy "occupy" tents down by the water.
When beginning to trust the Lord in your everyday transactions, your heart will be inclined to trust the Lord with more important things. His Blessings are found in obedience. What will you give to God today? Your heart is His Desire. A heart turned to the Lord will see His Merciful, Compassionate and Unfailing Love. No longer do you have to divide your life between the world and God but the Lord is worthy of your heart and all of its contents. How far will you go in giving to God? There are various comfort levels in life that can become like the Church of Laodicea or the place of complacency. Don’t tear your clothing…the things you can touch…but tear your heart before God. If God looked in your heart today what would He see? How much trust would he find? Is there enough faith to give God your stuff? How about your time? Well, now that you have servanthood, service and giving working in your life? What about the ones you love? Do you trust God with them? Abraham walked up the side of a mountain not knowing whether he would come down the other side with Isaac or not, but He knew God was faithful. Obedience carried Abraham up that hill. God’s faithfulness would bring him dancing and rejoicing with Isaac down the other side. A heart given to God will trust Him with the lives of those contained in their heart no matter what the outcome. Such a heart has decided that God is worthy of giving their whole heart and all that remains inside to the One who loves them most. Clear away the clutter of this world until only one thing remains. Love should be all that is in a heart worthy of God. Now give that generously, too. To everyone you meet. Patience will be required which is giving up your wants and ambition. Forgiveness is giving you up for others. Compassion reveals a god-filled inclination that puts others in front of us. Knead your heart until all that remains is love.
According to the lawsuit, the collusion occurred through a series of meetings, email exchanges, and telephone calls in 2008 and 2009 (GalleyCat has the details of these allegations) and culminated in the introduction of the agency model in early 2010, just ahead of the April debut of the iPad. (You may remember the February 2010 standoff between Amazon and Macmillan, in which Amazon turned off Macmillan's buy buttons in protest of the agency model, but later capitulated and turned them back on.) As a result, the lawsuit alleges, consumers have paid tens of millions of dollars more for ebooks than they otherwise would have.
James gave Oregon football its swagger. He gave college football’s fashion kings the right to wear different swag every week. He added to the joy that is Oregon Duck football. Here are some of the LaMichael James highlights.
But, as it was at the time, while the newspaper allowed Booker to pursue the issue in his column – with the research carried out by myself – it offered us no support. Instead, its own defence correspondent, Sean Rayment, followed a conflicting line, pushing for more Warriors, a theme he was to return to, even as Booker was pushing for the mine protected vehicle solution.
This is perhaps not so surprising when we consider the psychological benefits of valuing and taking responsibility for our health and taking positive action to nurture it. This change in attitude and behaviour can be far more powerful than the act itself.
The question many people wonder: Is he insane, or a mooch, or simply dedicated to leading a simple, honest, dare we say, Christ-like existence?
Tony Tiah Thee Kian was charged in the Shah Alam Sessions Court here today
When Jesus miraculously feeds 5000 people his popularity soars not only because hungry people were fed, but also because the people saw Jesus as a second Moses. Moses had led Israel out of slavery in Egypt. It was in the desert that God fed the people through Moses with manna, bread from heaven. With Jesus also performing a miracle feeding, the people began to wonder if Jesus was the prophet that Moses spoke of. If Moses led Israel out of slavery in Egypt, maybe Jesus will lead them out of Roman oppression. But Jesus has something else in mind and in the end many of his disciples desert him.
destroyed
of nearby wilderness . . .
3. Tie two bows with May Arts Silk Ribbon, one larger than the other.
Are you a stranger by my side,
R patted and kissed the frame. We put it back up an she blew a kiss to her brothers. A perfect start to the day.
Proceedings of the National Electronics Conference, Volume 2
Quote of the Day:
I'm glad we didn't quit on it, the ravioli was incredible
The Music Court – Matthew Coleman is a cool cat who knows his music. Seriously. He’s extremely passionate and knowledgeable on the subject and he’s not afraid to share his opinions. I enjoy anyone who loves music as much as he does.
One Chinese consumer electronics company has repeatedly tried to improve the way it innovates. Senior management has called for new ideas and sponsored efforts to create new best-in-class processes, while junior engineers have designed high-quality prototypes. Yet the end result continues to be largely undifferentiated, incremental improvements. The biggest reason appears to be a lack of cross-company collaboration and a reliance on processes designed to build and reinforce scale in manufacturing. In effect, the technical and commercial sides of the business don’t cooperate in a way that would allow some potentially winning ideas to reach the market. As Chinese organizations mature, stories like this one may become rarer.
No wonder the Pope doesn't want to get involved with Priests having sex with children---it's OK in the VATICAN
There are a total of six stories occupying my head right now.
I now give you Patrick and Mike with the rundown on the Open door tryouts.
Skinny jeans. Big ass.
It seems like it was only yesterday that the Friends of Fish Creek Birding Course visited Carburn Park. While it has been a little over a month, the differences are astounding. The ice on the river has almost completely cleared up, and all three ponds are completely ice-free and full of waterfowl and gulls of all kinds.
You may wonder, as I have, “What kind of theology is this? Is it actually good to be afflicted?”
1 broad-
I’m sorry to say that my second encounter with Ms. Morton left me more than a little disappointed. In fact, though The Distant Hours seemed like it would have many of the same characteristics as Morton’s earlier work, they were almost entirely absent from this book. The Distant Hours felt under-crafted and under-thought, with paper-thin characters and a heavy-handed delivery. It’s all the more surprising because I described The Forgotten Garden as finely crafted, with a light touch of symbolism. The Distant Hours is the opposite. Edie is a clunky narrator with no apparent personality and her voice often drew me out of the narrative with references to “what she’d learn later” or things she “wished she could have known then.” She has no personality of her own and her mother’s connection to the castle is never properly exploited.
Up towards the top of the tray
As of now, nothing is set in stone, but we’re definitely hoping to play some shows overseas. Naked skydiving sounds great as well. Maybe we’ll combine the two and play a show while skydiving naked.
The slogan search was a bit of fun but comes at the cost of exposing the negative self-deprecatory ‘irishness’ of the place.
To make each petal, I melted Wilton pink candy melts and piped petal shapes onto a parchment paper lined rolling pin. Before the chocolate dried, I used my finger to thin out and shape each petal.
This is the year I ask, what am I willing to give?
More fundamentally, in a jurisdiction which considers pro bono work as an ethical obligation, one might say that providing the work is mandatory in any case. See David Fagelson, "Rights and Duties: The Ethical Obligations to Serve the Poor," 17 Law & Ineq.: A J. of Theory & Prac. 171, 182-189 (Winter 1999); see generally Robin Westbrook, "Lawyering and the Low-Income Taxpayer," 124 Tax Notes 704 and 705-706 (August 17, 2009).
Using the moniker of ‘jun03′ on the Lion City Forum, he started a thread titled “I am being scolded a ‘dog’ by someone today’ yesterday, describing that he had never experienced such a big ‘insult’ in his entire life.
This dish isn't the most beautiful thing to look at but it tastes good, is easy to put together, is economical and my kids really like. This is one of those go to meals when you don't have a lot of time to make something.
What it is:
Something I didn't really notice at all until was pointed out about this fig that a little tough to look past was her waste and how thin it is compared to the rest of her body.
Weakness: Free throw shooting and turnovers have been the Aggies’ Achilles heel all season. They turn the ball over 14.6 times per game, good enough for second to last in the WAC. Meanwhile they only shot free throws at 66.7 percent. Possessions are key in the Big Dance and not being able to have quality possessions will doom the Aggies.
Several others tethered themselves part of the time, she said.
First, you'll need to get a set of glass marbles that have one flat side. I got mine at the dollar store in the section where all of the candles are. I also grabbed a bunch of magnet buttons from Michaels. I think that I paid $4 for 100 of them, which is a great deal. Wash all of the glass to make sure there's no dust on them.
Do you find difficulty in climbing stairs up and down? Then a stairlift is the best solution to your problems. Stair lifts are mechanical devices that are used for elevating people to the top floors without the pain of climbing the stairs.
the cloud of cumin, cardamom, cinnamon
In the darkness at the edge.
“Jesus, it’s about time,” she said, in a voice that used to belong to the forty-one year old dockhand who had worked alongside Keith up until a few months ago. “It’s me Keith. It’s me”
After multiple calls they finally sending me a new one today and I should get it by tomorrow. Fingers cross that this time it will be perfect. Good thing I will put myself on a ban after this. I'm so traumatized by this experience and I almost fainted when I opened the red box.
The bars are hearty, healthy and dense. Perfect for a quick out-the-door snack or on-the-road breakfast. And while you’re out and about, come on over. I have a sink full of dishes that needs your attention.
We discovered Aiden’s heart malady by accident. Ellen was into natural food, natural medicine, whole-grain seaweed sandwiches and eggs that came from free-range chickens who had bedtime stories read to them each night before they settled into their nests. Natural childbirth with a midwife. All that stuff. She was convinced antibiotics were the forbidden fruit, so she didn’t run to the HMO every time our kids were sick. But something told her to take Abby in for some chest congestion she couldn’t get rid of. Aiden was with her, and on a lark the doctor placed the stethoscope on his chest.
It occurs to me that it has been quite some time since I have written a post about unschooling. I'm not really certain why that is. Maybe I have written so much about it that I ran out of things to say, or perhaps I just have so many other things that are on my mind right now that I haven't really even had time to give the matter much thought. After all, as I wrote yesterday unschooling isn't something that I am, it's something that we do. The longer we've been at this, the less I have come to see unschooling as a choice and the more I have come to view it simply as a set of principles with which we live our lives. That said, every once in a while I think it's a good thing to step back and examine why we make the choices we do, if for no other reason than to ensure that we are parenting consciously and avoiding the mistakes of living our lives on autopilot. So this morning as I was on my way to work, I began to have an internal dialog and challenge why I think we have made this choice to unschool.
The project is nearly complete- only a long range tank and roof rack to be fitted and its ready for travel. I am hoping to get away later this week after motocross camp with Dave. It seems the roads along the Darling river may be open in part. We shall see.
Earlier this week I shared a recipe that was inspired by the Cherry Blossoms blooming all around me, so to balance out my light, refreshing, girly salad, I decided to do the complete opposite for the next one.
First, as I pointed out above, economic overhead is higher than the ‘faultless private sector’.
Joe Knight (Organ, Piano)
When we got there after visiting my show, they had a lunch buffet, but it was like 18 bucks a person, and $54 for the three of us, plus tip, plus tax, plus a stomach that won't fit $18 worth of food was so not going to happen, so we asked to be seated and got menus. After looking at all the tasty 5 dollar appetizers we would share, my mom noticed that at the bottom of the page, in small letters, it stipulated that each person must order $25 worth of food to eat in the dining room, which is where we were seated. That was followed by a horrifying conversation with our clearly displeased waiter where I offered to take our food to go, if needed. "No, fine, just order." So we ordered our food and it was SO delicious, like 'I wanted to lick the plate and then mate with it' delicious. Crispy fried onion fritters, spicy flaky pockets of mashed potato, green peas, and chilies, and chicken pakora, so salty and crunchy, all with tamarind dipping sauce that was sweet and cool and tangy. It was amazing.
The He woke up and find himself amoung all.
Context on the show: The government of Australia wants Bart punished for a prank, and when Homer wants to know “What kind of a sick country would kick someone with a giant boot?” the U.S. delegate hushes them with the quote in question.
Here we go then:
If you wish to be automatically updated when a new Daily Minute is posted click here for the main page of this blog, then enter your email in the box in the top left and click the tab that says FOLLOW and you’ll get an email with the link each time a new one is released. (Note: if you are on an IPAD or Mobile, you may have to scroll all the way to the bottom, past the very first post to see this option).
She freely admits that she is unhappy, she lives in poverty, can’t work because of her disabilities – she freely writes in her book about her crummy marriage. And divorce.
white nights might not make the cut but
Of course, retrospectives like these were bound to drop the odd spoiler or two given the amount of time that’s elapsed since 2005, and even though they didn’t give the game away entirely, six years is a long time to keep yourself spoiler-free. So it was that I inevitably began Shadow of the Colossus slightly tainted – I had an inkling about what the end might entail but I wasn’t entirely sure how it would play out.
07. Critical Stage
10. 2 4.25" x 5.5" cards with envelope
This was a lush place – bananas and coffee growing together, cultivation as far as the eye could see. Where were the owners of these estates? I saw only the peasants; small huts, pigs, skinny horses, people living dustily among garbage…
I want to cry.
The beauty of this construct is that our coding problem is solved. As long as we can create inner classes within one of Pega’s Java activities then reference the functionality those classes bring within the same activity, everything will work nicely. The code is localized and can be tested as a unit and no changes have to be made in the SIT, QA, or Production code environments to accommodate our code. Certainly, if this functionality grows and needs more full-fledged support, it can easily become a library and be worked into the system at a later date and in a structured fashion.
MP: When you were talking about Cold Shot To The Heart, you said you were looking forward to writing a straight-up crime novel. Is there another genre or sub-genre you’re looking forward to tackling?
“Jake! Jake Hanna?”
A point which in the wider context of the season might yet prove crucial. It was not as is being seen in some quarters, the end of the world nor a signal that third place is out of Arsenal’s hands; that is patently not true unless Newcastle turn the goal difference delta around. And as spectacular as that would be, their run-in consisting suggests that it is unlikely. Thus Arsenal need to match their results; that is not to discount Spurs or Chelsea but with maximum totals between them of 72 points, again them finishing higher than Arsenal seems unlikely.
Most of its income was guaranteed, as it came from local authorities. But Blackstone wasn’t prepared to be a long-term owner. Soon, it had hived off many of the freeholds of the buildings to another company, which then sold them off.
By 1975, the band had broken up.
Set just before the turn of the new millennium, insurance agency worker Virginia “Gin” Baker (Catherine Zeta-Jones) is onto a highly sought after thief who stole a Rembrandt painting. She convinces her boss Hector (Will Patton) to let her go undercover and infiltrate the thief’s plans firstly by spying on him and then hopefully gaining an advantage by working with him on his next heist. The high-end thief’s name is Robert “Mac” MacDougal; he has stolen many fine arts pieces before and has gotten away with it countless times, but hopefully Gin will find his weaknesses and finally bring the criminal to justice. After a few days at Mac’s remote island castle, Gin convinces him that she is in fact a thief as well and that she is the one who stole the Rembrandt. Willing to give her a chance, Mac goes along with her requests to go after a Chinese mask that she needs to secure an even bigger heist that will imminently be worth much more than the Rembrandt and the mask combined. After many frustrating days training and rehearsing the motions of swiftly stealing the mask in as little time as possible, they head out to complete their mission. Things however get tight and Mac forces Gin to spill the beans about her true identity and purpose of involving him in these heists. After a few tussles and struggles both physically and mentally, they get back on track to commit the crime of the 20th century; but has their partnership turned into much more than just business? Will feelings get in the way of committing the crime all thieves wish they can pull off?
I know this space is mine................
15:40 SPCs, the central European patent and court
He can never go anywhere near Periyava, but he can at least try not to hurt the Periyava even after his shedding His Mortal Frame.
10.
25All is not Heav'n's while Abelard has part,
Recently, Billy the Elephant at the L.A. Zoo got to move in to a completed section of his new exhibit. The beautiful elephant enclosure is due to open on December 16th and Billy will be joined by two female elephants (rescued from a private owner) on loan from San Diego.
Five reasons are enough. Hell, the first one is enough. The long knives are coming out because Repub bigshots have had enough. They want Romney, and – like the coach who sends his unscathed quarterback unscathed into the fourth quarter after the rest of the team has slogged – they want him in tiptop shape. They cannot afford to let Gingrich toss mudballs and flick-knives at him.
iv. He exhorts them as his children, as having begotten them in Christ, and threatens to come soon to Corinth to rebuke and punish these false, boastful, and puffed-up teachers (vers. 15-21)
I am very lucky to have parents who are open-minded about my unconventional ways of raising my children. The writer of this article is not as lucky. She has a mother who judges the way she raises her children, and is not subtle about it. Here is what happened at lunch with her mother and her children:
Lellman is considered legally deaf, but with a hearing aid, he can hear about two-thirds as well as the average hearing person. He was taught in a deaf school until third grade, when he entered regular public school. Though he continues to think in American Sign Language, he lost many of his signing skills and is now relearning much of the language at NIU — and embracing a part of himself that was lost.
She knows all about Monsanto....and her story made my guts churn.
Conveniently this spot was very close to the Devil’s Head Resort main entrance AND it butted right up against the edge of the golf course. What did we do? We pitched my backpacking tent up on the golf course behind a couple of trees. As I was by my Jeep pulling out sleeping bags we had hotel security stop by on their golf carts and ask us how things were going. They didn’t notice the tent and offered to give our stuff a lift to the front desk and I told them we didn’t have a spot in the hotel and we were sleeping in the car. After that they were incredibly nice and offered to give us food and water if we needed it. I still don’t know what they would’ve done if they saw the tent on the golf course.
"True," I agreed hopefully. "And the very existence of those rocks is a strong indication --"
Unfortunately, there can be only one winner of the random prize draw of the £15 Joanna Sheen gift voucher which this time has been won by
Orthomolecular medicine uses safe, effective nutritional therapy to fight illness. For more information: http://www.orthomolecular.org
And for the non-resolutioners.... stop judging the resolutionites for the love of pete. If we want to give it a shot, then let us, jeeze.
DAK: That's okay, we're just renting.
Skatenigs – Stupid People Shouldn’t Breed. This album really varies from song to song, but “Shit Authority” sounds just like the Moistboyz! That’s unique. “Fight Da Suckas” reminds me more of Red Hot Chili Peppers from their Mother’s Milk era. “Poundsauce”, “Roadkill” remind me of Ministry. “I Got It Made” has a nice rap-ish feel to it while still maintaining a rock/metal feel still slightly reminiscent of MInistry. But the opening song, “Chemical Imbalance”, will always stand out to me because Beavis & Butt-head watched it! And the opening beatnik-ish soliloqy by that chick, while coming off as quite pretentious when you first hear it, really grows on you. And “Loudspeaker” just kicks ass.
And I like the profoundly Popperian question: ‘what data would it take to change your mind?’
It seems to be only American producers who are turning away from age statements. In the scotch segment we're seeing more, not fewer.
3) There is a clear purpose at the Blog; one that fosters a better understanding on Social, Political, Economic, the Arts, Culture and Sciences and Beliefs.
I think Jaxon knew I was going to need a little extra help. I think that he asked me to set that goal to bring the spirit into our home. To keep me calm, and to help the kids make good choices. Sometimes he's smarter than I am.
“My name is Roman, ma’am. Thank you for the porridge.”
David Castle Someday I’d love to try metal sculpture – big, industrial, welded pieces that one might see in Gotham City. I have some big, dark, chunky shapes in my head that can only go so far with watercolors and paper…
So, that's what I've learned this week. How about you? My ears are open.
What's your "waiting on" pick this week?
Make sure that the contractual obligations to your employees are clarified from the beginning. This downloadable set of template Contracts of Employment can be effortlessly applied to meet the needs of small businesses.
And there are no perfect spouses or perfect families - but what makes a family a good one, what makes it all so special, is when one begins to fall, the other is there to answer.
And those are my journals! And like I mention my main journal is about to be finished so, I got a new one today.
So, what is a girl to do when she’s wading knee-deep in money woes? She dreams about shopping and the things she wants to buy.
I often find great and encouraging things running through my mind while my feet are hitting the pavement, or the stair beast (or stair master), or what have you. So I thought I’d write some of them down.
The shimmers are a bit more obvious under flash light, but they’re not chunky or overloaded. The result on your cheeks is invariably a lovely glow instead of disco ball. I’m glad Tarte expanded the Amazonian Clay blush range with these shimmer shades as they do provide more variety to blush lovers. Each shade is gorgeous in it’s own right, and as usual I had no problems with the texture or formula.
The new iTunes U, which also is free and available on Thursday, will “allow anyone, anywhere, at any time to take courses for free,” Schiller said, according to Fortune.com’s Philip Elmer-DeWitt, who was live blogging from the event. Fortune is a partner site of CNN.com.
Charmaine Hammond, author On Toby’s Terms
I’ve been working on my grief book, typing what I wrote immediately after the death of my soul mate. Suddenly it seems as if the past sixty-two weeks have melted into oblivion and I’m back there again, newly bereft, wandering in a fog of pain, wondering how to cope with the massive changes in my life. I know I have come a long way because the revisited pain seems bewildering to me. Did I really feel all that? Did I really survive such a terrible time? Apparently I did, because here I am, mostly back to normal. I’m still lonely, though, and the loneliness surges unbearably at times.
I believe these are two important things that the Lord wanted to show me through this section of scripture. It amazes me at how God can use the scripture to reveal things to you. He works in amazing ways. It really opened my eyes up to God’s will and His desire for our lives. Which excites me!
Kohen: A Kohen (כוהן) is a member of the Aharonite family, within the Levite tribe, being the priests who took care of the sacrifices in the Temple. The High Priest is termed “Kohen HaGadol” (כהן הגדול), meaning “The biggest priest.” He had the responsibility for leading the prayers of the Hagim, as well as going to the Holiest of the Holy on Yom Kippur, being the only one who was allowed to do so.
This is Part 28 in a 32 part instalment thanks to an email I found when cleaning up my work emails.
For a whole life time we have heard about the conversation amidst the battle field. Why not another version? Mahabharata is a poetry written by a much talented poet named Vyasa. He was a language and literature enthusiast. If I am right they are the first of its kind literature that happened many years back. So at that time there was a big war that happened between two families. He was a man of his kind. In a later stage he jotted down the whole incident in an interesting way. His writing was so artistic and imaginative that it impressed many of the coming generations.
Mister Max 1939 Hollywood Movie Watch Online Full Movie
Little kid think he got game, rolling up on me like its Final Mix, mix
Here is the unpublished opinion. The underlying dispute apparently is the usual and accustomed fishing area of the Lummi Indian Tribe.
My message is this: be a little bit sensitive to the opinions of others - it's easy to get sucked into a little world where your own obsession is the only thing in your world, but let other people in. And if you can't do that, at least allow them to exist outside without attack.
Almost everyone knows about the Vanilla Bake Shop but it's worth sharing for those who haven't. I had come across it awhile ago and was reminded when I saw Amy Berman sharing one of her cupcake recipes on the Martha Stewart Show a few weeks ago. How I wish I lived on the West coast so I could stop by and pick up some of their sweets!
Clouded Yellow - (Wheat Beer)
Sally Field easily won the hometown date. Her Texas was a good Texas. Her family, even if divorced, seemed really functional and her mother’s face still held up well (the rest not so much). The best part was that her dad was like Tom Hanks, which was so Kevin Bacon because Sally Field was Tom Hanks’ mother in Forrest Gump. Well, more a Tom Hanks vibe than look. The dad was so cool and nice, I was pretty much not going to say anything bad. Nikki told Ben she loved him, which she will soon regret, but not as much as the frozen sex in Switzerland. She looked pretty once she took off the disco ball and Ben clearly had some “moments where marrying Nikki didn’t feel like a life of death”.
The downside?
Pacific Gas And Electric Completes Notes offering For $500 Million 21
will be drawn and a crew will come to remove it.
I put the book in the car as I drove Logan to his game. When your kid is the ref at a soccer game, you don’t have to really pay attention. You don’t have to cheer for the near misses or clap for the goals scored. You really only have to be there so that you can drive your cherub home after the game.
The heathens dispatched of what meat I left out for them (most of it was packaged away for a celebration later in the week) in short order, with arguments over which was best, the inside meat or the outside meat. I prefer the outside, with the smoke ring and sweet crusty stuff…and the bit of fat. Oh yes the fat is spicy and silky and…not at all gross. It is, I am sure, fattening. But that is why one does not eat barbeque like this every day, but reserves it for celebrations such as the one upcoming later in the week. Others prefer the inside meat, with it’s gentle flavor and juiciness. It’s fortunate that we don’t all love the same thing because then there wouldn’t be enough for everyone.
The PTO established a prima facie case under Section 2(e)(4) by submitting more that 5,000 database and Internet hits establishing that FIORE is not a rare surname, along with "negative" dictionary evidence showing that FIORE has no meaning in English. The Board agreed with the PTO that FIORE has the "look and feel" of a surname, but did not "think this factor strongly favors the examining attorney's position." Applicant Isabella Fiore, LLC did not dispute "that the word FIORE is a surname."
GERRY ADAMS
Paid vacation is one of the most priced commodities for many middle and lower rung employees in the corporate structure and increasingly there is more and more evidence that regimented rationing of vacation time is an outdated and often counter-productive idea.
This is bar none my favorite show of all time. The great thing about this show is exactly the opposite of what makes The Wire a great show. They get in, get out, and the everything is wrapped up nicely in every episode. There are comedic themes and threads that run throughout several shows, or even the entire series, but overall the show is just a bunch of assholes who act rotten toward one and other, and the world writ large, and because of this sometimes find themselves in funny or awkward positions.
You can slice the beans in any way you want, you just have to make sure they are able to soften up a bit during cooking.
Bronx Beat
So pardon me as I dance around the room singing, "Don Reid of the Statler Brothers e-mailed me! He liked my review! My six degrees of separation to the country music world has been cut tremendously!" Wow, that is a wordy little ditty to sing!
However, with sincere respect, I think telling would-be clients and authors not to use .docx is a Bad Idea and sends the wrong message. I’m beginning to think these kinds of cludgey, technologically-backward impulses are what make us look like anachronistic gatekeepers. Docx has been around for years. It’s the default file format for the most pervasive word processor on the planet. When we ask our clients not to use it, we look foolish and cheap. We look technologically unaware when we say that Microsoft created .docx to force people to upgrade (not true). It’s also maddening that the part of the publishing industry that’s managing the inflow of manuscripts is actively resisting XML (what did you think the x in .docx was for?) while the side of the industry that manages the outflow of finished books is killing itself to embrace XML, because it’s supposed to save our collective asses.
This was not to be, she was filled with spite
The story's touchstones of music, perseverance, and faith could wield such force only in the American South. There, in the Louisiana lowlands’ Concordia Parish, their story began in the midst of the Great Depression.
As you can see from the wide variety of nominees, Art Direction is about setting the stage for the story and characters, not just about making pretty rooms or scenes. If the room is to be pretty, it should be gorgeous, but if the scene is gritty, then the viewer should almost feel the dirt.
When the cookies are cool enough (leave in the tray for 5 minutes and then cool on a wire rack for 10 - 15 minutes) spread the icing over each underside of the cookie and then sandwich. Place in mouth. Place another one in your mouth. Make a cup of tea and dunk that cookie in it!
Oct 31 – Jillians – Las Vegas, NV (W/Cobra Starship)
1. Yet, even explaining the death seems to make it trival or lessen its importance.
- We must take 100% responsibility for our lives. Anything short of that won’t get us what we really want.
This labelling would of course provoke a shitstorm in the US, as there, unlike here, “craft beer” has a specific meaning closely watched over by the Brewers’ Association. Blue Moon, as one of the speciality brews of mammoth brewer Molson Coors (although they coyly prefer to promote it as ‘Blue Moon Brewing Company’), doesn’t qualify.
Lastly I made a top sheet to go with it as I wanted a layered effect. Not massively happy with this to be honest as you will probably be able to tell by the fact that I have fiddled so much with it! Letting you into my secrets here but generally the more embellished I make something the less satisfied with it I am. So we have a pink background with little daisies and at the bottom some broderie anglais trim that was left over from some dresses my Mum made the girls. There wasn't enough to go all around so the sides have the same trim as the cat and mouse pillow. I used some green ribbon as a strip up each side to complement the greens in the other fabrics and hide the stitches from hemming the sheet. Finally I added a length of white velvet ribbon at the top because I adore the texture of velvet and thought the top needed something extra.
Please be sure to stop by Monday and add your sentence to the story. Hope your challenge is going good. Have a great Easter!
And just when you thought the rivalry couldn’t get any more serious, the competition between the cross-road rivals does not stop short at cousins, it also includes best friends, work-mates, employer-employee relationships and has also included sibling rivalry as well. Interclub marriages create a special intensity and throws up the obvious challenges and turmoil of the big question – which club will the kids play for? Nonetheless, when the results are finalized on a Saturday afternoon, there are no favors handed out to family members, friends, elders, teachers, students, bosses or work mates. The banter between the two sporting clubs is all a part of one of the biggest rivalry phenomenon’s in Australia.
It is Menu Plan Monday! This is what we hope to eat this week :)
Guess, I'll be good and get the ice pack and the nerve stimulator thingy and hook myself up!
Mary Nanna from Make It Smirk. She always make me smirk when I read her blog. I fully expect she won't have the time to forward this award on, as these days she seems to be confined to the kitchen. I always enjoy reading about her latest creations and her fitting issues.
Do not unjustly eat fish the water has given up,
I’ll cut to the good part if you don’t feel like reading the whole thing. We qualified 127 Outlaw Way followers for Regionals. That’s by my count (I’ve done it a couple times), and that’s including Masters. This is by no means a completed list, but is a good start. Read on…
But his coach Steve Dintaman wasn’t giving up on him. He was inspired to help Dan and to help others in need of blood donations.
Was I just unlucky? Are all the other polishes super opaque and apply like butter? Put me out of my misery!
trying to decide if i am in pain
An Ceann Comhairle: ￼ ￼ Can we please proceed with the Committee Stage of the Bill?
alongbine: Tell them I said “Hi”. Don’t want to leave them out.
No matter what grade I am teaching, I have always put the standards into kid friendly terms. I just knew there was no way they were going to understand or pay attention to the standards as they were written. I could have stood there and explained it to them, but I'm sure in ten minutes time, they wouldn't have remembered anything I said since they had nothing to connect it to.
Orpheus - To most he’s an enigma, a devil-may-care rogue who does whatever he pleases whenever he wants. Now this loose cannon is part of the Eternal Guardian - elite warriors assigned to protect the human realm - whether he likes it or not.
Stuckey asserts:
HERO shows Qh Qs (Pair of Queens)
I want what is best for my children, and so everything I do with or for them is because I am looking out for their best interests. I also know my children better than anyone else that we associate with. I know their personalities, and I know some of their history. I know their weaknesses, I know their strengths. I know what sets them off, I know what calms them down. And you, dear person who is giving me the condescending glare from across the room, don’t.
Buddha: Well, heavy drinking is kinda like training. You know how some people stare at the sun and stuff. If it’s internaly destructive, it kinda works in a similar way.
Gave, once, her flowers to love, her ways to roam,
What Harris-Lacewell's remarks point to are the positive: that among Americans there is generally a good will and a desire for reconciliation. But in order to get there, we're going to have to face some of the ugliness and we're going to have to give up this unattainable illusion of perfection, either for some post-racial utopia or of a nation without a blemish in its character or its history.
to be a fantastic balanced article on the subject and may just direct my kids there when they’re old enough. Because as a mother, I would have difficulty discussing it with my boys. And I know their father would never feel comfortable. Clearly we’re not far enough along the evolutionary (make that sexual revolutionary) path.
The second book Indian Food, is authored by Dr K.T. Achaya. He is also a scientist and I had the privilege of meeting him in Hyderabad in 1990. And here he is, too!
Watchers - Angels And Agony
ice cream taste test (all summer)
When it comes to video podcasts, Miro goes far beyond iTunes by letting you subscribe to BitTorrent RSS feeds, with one of the fastest torrent downloaders in the world. Miro makes BitTorrent RSS dead simple– when a new episode is available, it will download automatically and be ready to watch.
Gaddafi was overly demonized by the Western media just like Dr H.F. Verwoerd was in the early 60’s. I thus couldn’t help but chuckle when I noticed the sardonic title, “Death of Gaddafi - a nation mourns” appearing on some news sites. It’s a title plagiarised from the famous “Private Eye” cover on the death of Dr H.F. Verwoerd of September 1966. That cover carried the words “Verwoerd: a nation mourns”, under a photo of jubilant black warriors dancing with their shields and knopkieries, which I think is rather reminiscent of the pictures we are seeing today of the euphoric Libyan rebels dancing in the streets with their assault-rifles. A picture of the “Verwoerd” cover can be viewed here.
The amendment passed in the legislature just before midnight Wednesday does not make any of those changes. Instead, the government has added a preamble that details the intent of the law.
The other night Jake and I went on a Craigslist rampage and got a couple things. We bought Jaxon's glider for his room and a Dyson vacuum cleaner! And I feel like we stole both of them! The glider that we bought has an ottoman and the nursing stool attached. This Dutailier brand retails new from anywhere between $350-600 and we got it for $130 and it's in great shape!!! And we got a Dyson vacuum for $100 and it's practically brand new and works better than all the other vacuums we have. We figured we'd need a good one with all the new carpet in the house. Jake and I are pretty much just the best bargain hunters around.
In order to help others, you must always first help yourself.
Cam Jansen. This meets my requirements but I can't get into that character for some reason. I think what bothers me is that she has to get a lot of detective help from the boys around (every 2nd or 3rd cover has a boy on it) and basically only solves the mysteries because she has a photographic memory she seems to spend all day "clicking." I just couldn't get enthused.
by Val Koinen
indescribable ways. We’re trying as many things as possible; but it
Gillian Philip writes like a dream. Whether she's turning her hand to a fantasy Scotland where exiled Sithe faeries roam the land or, as here, a modern YA crime novel with a challenging subject, she's a winner from any reader's point of view.
Inevitability, chance, let’s accept them all
Whatever our conclusions about the film's theme, though, it's nice to see a horror film that's thought through the purpose of its violence, even if a bit more thought might have led to a more complex and rewarding experience overall.
Kidding aside, the presentation was well done, even if social scientists may have benefited more than the lawyers in the room. The lecture explained well the goals of Project Lantern—decrease child trafficking and increase local capacity to address it going forward.
The Republic of the Maldives is an island nation located in the Indian ocean southwest of India and Sri Lanka. It is a 10 hour flight from London to the capital of Male. It is made up of 1,192 coral islands forming a double chain of atolls. Atolls are coral reef islands surrounding lagoons.
Getting to the negatives first, the knife came unusable as a cutting device. I do know that I've never had a knife come out of the box with a worse edge. After using my Griptilian for nearly two months, did I feel the need to get the edge back into shape. This was done in about ten minutes with a set of Lanskey Croc Sticks. After nearly 20 minutes of work with the same, the improved edge still wouldn't cut the top off a tied plastic Walmart bag. I was warned by the single review on KnifeCenter, but I didn't not take it too seriously. To be perfectly honest, my sharpening skills are poor. That is my fault, but putting edges on metal is not my job. If I wanted to redo an edge into functional status I would be making my own knives and I'd have a RK mk1 subhilt on my hip and be busy selling you guys knives verses reviewing them. I have two fixed blades with not so great edges, however both are styles that are known for this very problem. One is a small double edged spear point, Fallkniven Garm, and the other is a single edged dagger point, Boker Trench. Neither broad enough to have the deep bellies that make for great cutters. The ECS-4 possess a modified spear point making this rather inexcusable when other examples like that on the Kershaw Skyline are excellent. As a result, I did not carry this but a few times just to see how it carried.
Also, if you're going to put words on your body, be sure it's something you won't mind explaining to every curious person you encounter. People seem to lose all sense of personal boundaries when it comes to tattoos, and they WILL want to know why you have whatever specific quote or song lyric tattooed on you. They will ask, and they will ask for the rest of your life. Be prepared.
Arout
Okay, now that it is over I am …I am able to get back to my table and do MORE NETWORKING! I am so grateful that my father made me literally EAT POLITICS as a child because I had even Congressman Altmire taking a photo with so indeed I was flattered and terribly shocked but happy!
In 2010, 553 votes were cast - the top 6 vote getters in no particular order were:
The restaurant , housed in a former butcher shop, serves Yorkshire born and bred beef from Tim Wilson, the man behind one of London's best steakhouses, The Hawksmoor. The meat is sent from Britain, aged a minimum of five weeks at the Beef Club's in house aging room, then prepared by media hungry butcher Yves Marie Le Bourdonnec, before being served up in an exposed brick dining room with wonky furniture. The fillet of rum steak with side of macaroni and three (English) cheese was tasty (though lacking salt) and perfectly cooked in their special broiler, however after a one hour wait! The same laboriously slow service continued throughout the meal for water, wine, coffee and bill, but luckily we weren't in a hurry, and the (harried) waiter was friendly enough.
”In the name of our Lord Jesus Christ, when ye are gathered together, and my spirit, with the power of our Lord Jesus Christ, to deliver such an one unto Satan for the destruction of the flesh, that the spirit may be saved in the day of the Lord Jesus. Your glorying is not good. Know ye not that a little leaven leaveneth the whole lump? Purge out therefore the old leaven, that ye may be a new lump, as ye are unleavened. For even Christ our passover is sacrificed for us: therefore let us keep the feast, not with old leaven, neither with the leaven of malice and wickedness; but with the unleavened bread of sincerity and truth.” 5:4-8
Stage 2: Pleasure - “Wow… oh man, this feels like a massage for my urethra…”
Evie is confused when the police don’t seem all that interested in finding Nick’s killer, claiming it was probably a mafia hit because the guy was a big time gambler. Evie doesn’t buy it. And neither does Lucas Minx who may be a ghost but apparently can not see into the future or tell her what happened to Nick. Ghosts like live people can only be in one place at a time.
Club members thanked Jason for all his support during the race on Saturday. Holding bags, taking pictures, being a meeting spot. I'm thankful for him, too. But I wouldn't be the runner I am today without all of them, either. And I'm proud of all my friends in the club. PRs, age group places, and great times were plentiful on Saturday. There's nothing like sharing the joy of a great race with other people.
i would love to send a copy of the Christy Nockels cd to
Or in other words, the world needs consciousness. What if everyone stopped what they were doing, took a deep breath and looked around. Even if it was only for an instant, at that time there would be no wars, no hatred, nothing we label as negative. There would only be consciousness.
The extensive menu with grill nights on Wednesdays and curry nights on Thursdays caters for all tastes, with pub classics from £2.99 to slow-cooked belly pork with mash for £6.69. The dessert menu is also inviting, with a giant chocolate fudge cake and sticky toffee pudding on offer.
The last time she flew by
#14 In America today, even 5-year-old children are treated brutally by police.
RFS broadcasts daily from London from 6pm to 8pm on SW 15420 KHz to Sarawak, especially the rural areas.
Dr. Andrew Coulson is Lead Consultant on Overview and Scrutiny at INLOGOV,University of Birmingham, with wide experience of Overview and Scrutiny. He has recently launched one of the first assessed qualifications on the subject. His further research interests include partnerships and governance, economic and environmental strategies, and local government in Central and Eastern Europe.
I’m writing from Brackenwall Village. I just finished a strategy session with Krog, Drazz’Zilb, and Dontrag and Utvoch. By all signs, the Grimtotem here in Dustwallow are still hitting the Stonemaul ogres, and I’ve also gotten confirmation from Orhan Ogreblade that the Grimtotem in Feralas are still active around the Maul. So, that tells us that the Grimtotem still believe that the phylactery is being held by the ogres in one place or the other, and that they haven’t gotten wind of what’s going on in Silithus yet. Which means if we move quickly, we might have an opportunity here.
Theater.
We had another beautiful Carolina day. Every day I see a little bit more green on the trees. I took Jack outside with his walker. He kept going in the grass and getting stuck. In the house though, his little feet just fly. When he figures out how to steer, we'll be in trouble.
However, the Japanese (Wa) and those with mixed Silla/Japanese heritage were evicted from their settlements along the southeastern coast of Korea and sent back to Japan as they were deemed “culturally distant” and “unsuitable” for permanent residence in Silla.
I believe Marcella H. says this should be served with fresh egg tagliatelle. Her classic lasagne recipe calls for matching this with homemade spinach pasta so that would probably also go well. We tend to eat it with penne or spaghetti, which taste pretty nice.
I pocket my phone and briefly watch her walk away. Candice looks back at me before she rounds the corner and disappears.
It has taken me a few weeks to pound out more than the three pages I struggled with at the beginning. I've now got 8 pages. I'm not pushing myself, because I can't work under that sort of pressure. I don't tell myself I have to write X amount of words or pages in a day. I'd rebel. I'm in charge of what I do, where and when and I've got the keys to this car and when I say we go, we go.
One small room, filled from corner to corner with things I love. Not
It starts with –YOU- !!
Joanne Nail didn't make many movies, but at least two of them have found long-loyal fans over the decades. And when technical snafus forced a previously-recorded commentary with her to be scrapped, and I was asked to sit with her and re-do it, it was a privilege for me to sit with the eternal Switchblade Sister. THE VISITOR is quite a goofy movie, with its parade of slumming legends (John Huston, Shelley Winters) and bizarre patchwork of elements from every major '70's trend (demonic possession, space travel, conspiracy theory), but you get caught up in it all the same. Part of the reason is the legitimately thought-out and committed performance by Nail, which she details in our chat, demonstrating that sometimes the best acting is devoted to the most ludicrous stories.
Even when poor health doesn’t keep obese workers home, it can cut into productivity, as they grapple with pain or shortness of breath or other obstacles to working all-out. Such obesity-related “presenteeism,” said Finkelstein, is also expensive. The very obese lose one month of productive work per year, costing employers an average of $3,792 per very obese male worker and $3,037 per female. Total annual cost of presenteeism due to obesity: $30 billion.
Well Genevieve, it would be ignorant and arrogant for me to say that there has never been any conspiracy ever, in all of our years of politics. Of course things are covered up to support a particular party or politician, ‘It’s politics’. But here I am talking about hiding some money transfers or biased reporting and investigaing but not these grand conspiracies where millions of people would be in on the plot, and hundreds of people killed as a result.
As for the twelve grapes of luck -las doce uvas de la suerte, a tradition that I have brought with me from Argentina- it is in fact, a Spanish tradition still kept in my family. When the clocks strike 12 at midnight on Nochevieja (Old Night, in Spanish), the twelve grapes are eaten, each grape representing a month and symbolising hope and good wishes for the New Year.
STO: Which bands would you consider your peers and why? If you could play with any band who would it be?
1 teaspoon Worchestershire sauce
A less exciting happening during the week was, we have joined a walking group which meets on Tuesday mornings at 8.30am. That's very early, to me....I am not a morning person by nature, getting up early all those years I was working was a real effort but I managed, and when I retired and could get up whenever I wanted not when the alarm said to it was wonderful, so I love being retired for that reason alone......but we went, and while I didn't manage the distance of those who have been walking for several months I hope to improve with time. I have even swallowed my pride and bought new walking shoes which are glowing shining shimmering......white. What is it about white shoes that makes one's feet look absolutely enormous? And why are most women's walking shoes white? They are comfortable, and I will wear them, but I do not like them. They make my feet look like Minnie Mouse's feet. I don't enjoy walking either, in fact even as a child I was never ever one who liked exercise or sport, but for my health's sake I felt I should do something more than sitting and sewing, or sitting and reading. So there it is.
1 preventing
Martin Vail is a prominent defense attorney in Chicago who jumps at the chance to represent Aaron Stampler, a young, stuttering altar boy accused of murdering the Archbishop. At first interested primarily in the publicity that the case will bring, Vail comes to believe that his client is truly innocent, much to the chagrin of the prosecutor (and Vail's former lover), Janet Venable.
Many stories that begin this way end much worse. Another colleague recently wrote about the final defendant to be sentenced in the beating death of 19-year-old James Robertson in East Ocean View five years ago. In that case, a swarm of gang members attacked Robertson and two friends. Robertson’s friends got away and called for help; police arrived to find Robertson’s stripped, swollen corpse.
I just remember trying to figure out who to report it to, but I woke up.
I had always dreamed of getting married in Ireland not only because its rolling green hills would provide a stunning backdrop, but also because it’s such a huge part of who I am. Although I grew up in New York, my parents are both from Ireland so the majority of my family is over there and my family spent every summer there. Luckily for me my dream of getting married in Ireland became a reality when I fell in love with someone who was half Irish (and half Spanish) and spent just as much time there growing up.
Many left as well as mainstream economists point to “economic growth” rather than austerity as what is needed to address the crisis of joblessness. One of the extremely serious contradictions that entails is the environmental fallout from capitalist growth. The more the economy grows, the more it degrades the planet, through pollution, squandering of natural resources, or direct destruction of ecosystems that are turned into plantations, pastures, mines, roads or cities.
We look forward to leaving presents for your child on Christmas 2005 and in the years to come. Have a jolly time with your new family addition!
3. I love collecting the inspiring books, especially the ones that win the Newberry Honor Award (excellent reading) for my future children. I loved books like Because of Win-Dixie, Bearstone, and A Swiftly Turning Planet and hope my children love them too.
DAD: You know I teach Real Estate Licensing classes, right?
Put off any attempt to hoik out pump and unblock cos am holding a screaming child and husband gets off the phone to the pediatrician saying "we have to take him to hospital now, she thinks it's appendicitis"
"Notwithstanding people's right to strike and their legitimate demands, these babies have the right to life, and we'll ensure that. We had to resuscitate many of them."
The first Supper Club was entitled ‘An Evening with Cloudy Bay’, and along with some fellow food bloggers (Nikki from Your Last Mouthful and Nicki from Cardiff Bites), Mr W and I enjoyed a four course menu, with each course accompanied by a different Cloudy Bay wine that had been specially chosen to complement the dish. A Cloudy Bay sommelier was on hand to explain each of the wines to us before we tried it, which made the evening feel like much more than just a normal meal out.
2) I really wasn't feeling a run that early in the morning but I knew I needed to get my butt back out there and get training again if I want to actually complete this 5k in July.
Hannah Mendelsohn from Juneau, Alaska doesn’t necessarily consider herself an artist. However, her creations are receiving widespread attention from many fans. She doesn’t paint nor does she sculpt. Instead, Hannah Mendelsohn uses something you might have in your kitchen cabinet right this moment: M&Ms!
This "Best of" bookazine covers nearly every space in the house; entryways, kitchens, bedrooms, closets, bathrooms, kid's rooms, utility rooms, and home office. Each section features some of the best ideas from past issues of Martha Stewart Living magazine, and helpful how-to for some of the organizing projects.
Now that the weather is warming up around here, I don't want to spend every evening cooking a large meal and heating up the kitchen. Here is a recipe for an easy soup that takes less than 10 minutes to make. My husband loves it.
A: … he will live for a week.
“We want to pay a fair price for good food and local farmers need support and a fair and consistent return, so this initiative will deliver a sustainable and secure food future.”
After a careful and circumspect evaluation of the Complaint, the Court cannot help but agree with the defendant. For although we believe that plaintiffs have but the noblest of all intentions, it (sic) fell short of alleging, with sufficient definiteness, a specific legal right they are seeking to enforce and protect, or a specific legal wrong they are seeking to prevent and redress (Sec. 1, Rule 2, RRC). Furthermore, the Court notes that the Complaint is replete with vague assumptions and vague conclusions based on unverified data. In fine, plaintiffs fail to state a cause of action in its Complaint against the herein defendant.
That giant bowl of lemons? Major impulse purchase. Shane rarely has to worry about me coming home with expensive shoes or bags, but there's no telling what might happen when I'm unleashed in the grocery store, or at the farmer's market. I don't know why I thought I needed so many lemons, but once I got them home I was determined not to let a single one go to waste.
I think Potter is right. Yes, perhaps in some places people have no entertainment but gossiping about the neighbours, but generally we do not know our neighbours well enough for that. Narcissistic projection onto others prevents a man from really understanding how they tick, and indeed the bedridden Marlowe’s imagining his wife like a character from his noirish detective novel, because that is his best understanding of other people, rings true. And possibly flamboyant self-expression gets tolerated, possibly admired, possibly ignored. There is no harm even if it is despised: What will people think? Lots of different things, actually.
(In fact I can't acknowledge him because he's slipped my mind,
That was exactly the OPPOSITE of what I was looking for. What happened with Preston is something that I have mentioned several times to the other midwives in the practice and none of them thought it was an issue for this pregnancy. I don’t want to be thrown into the same system of hyper-vigilant monitoring and intervention that I did last time. I don’t want the tests if I don’t NEED the tests. I feel like when you are monitoring pregnancy that closely at the end looking for problems, you are going to find something that you think is a problem that then leads to a most likely unnecessary early delivery. Also, at that appointment as she was feeling the baby she said that she was head up. That is pretty normal for 30 weeks. However, I had been feeling so worried about the same things happening this time around and with no encouraging words from her that it just added to the disappointment and discouragement.
7. Seeing as you have a sensible dinner ahead of you, keep things light: skip the dairy. This Chick Bake’s vegan ginger molasses cookie is spicy, cakey and oh-so-delicious.
I have never tried this technique before, but I will use my finished piece.
On en banc review, the Federal Circuit admitted that the "sliding scale" between intent and materiality "conflated and diluted" the doctrine of inequitable conduct.
Needless to say, I use both of them. I could launch into further questioning as to what that little tidbit says about me, but I’ll not do so. For your sakes. My mind automatically commenced the query when I first began this post, so there’s really nothing I can do about it for my sake.
Cherry Almond Irish Oatmeal
Sheep huddle against stone walls, keeping well out of the force of the wind. The hail, when it comes, is sharp and cuts into the skin. At least we end up with rosy cheeks.
In the first draft, I'm not really in control.
In 2009, I got my first lump and, like your first, it was drained and has not yet returned. But I have already vowed that if I get breast cancer down the road, I am opting for a double mastectomy with reconstruction to get a full size B cup . . . with some cleavage!
"Everybody want pancakes?" I asked.
As a ‘thank you’ I got some lovely goodies, and the stamp I used for today’s cards was one of those: it is Faye Whittaker ‘All Our Yesterdays’ by Joanna Sheen Rubber Stamps. As you will see, just as well that I live in Hoylake an old Victorian Seaside Resort. Those of you who remember the TV programe ‘Candi Cabs’, the one with the pink taxis, … which was screened a couple of years ago … it was filmed right here on my doorstep … almost, more like around the corner by the new Lifeboat Station.
1010 D-III/2(A)/1988. “Another Look at the Obscene.” The University of Wisconsin, Eau Claire, Wisconsin.
Like this picture
If you factor both the road closures in Cupar and Strathkinness then you're left with only one choice if like me you travel between Pitscottie and Dundee a lot. You've got to go all the way across to St. Fucking. Andrews at a time when fuel prices are at a record high and climbing and at a time where we're being told to be friendly to the environment by driving less miles. How am I supposed to do less mileage if Fife council closes all it's roads at the same time?
D was coming out of school this pm, she was late so there were pupils and school bus escorts around. One boy went past and hit her three times. The escort didn’t seem to notice and D didn’t want to go back into school to talk to his teacher so I’ll do that after drop-off tomorrow morning. She wasn’t happy all the way home and more unhappy once we got home, saving it up!
Well, we waited and waited and it finally opened up yesterday. I assumed it would be
2. Become Tyrant (Optional).
-if the Kenneys’ case had succeeded, it would have opened the floodgates to a torrent of assessment appeals, as hundreds of properties throughout war-torn Ontario are now seeing diminuition of property value. Therefore, it could NOT succeed.
A couple of libraries have come up with creative ways to attract more visitors for Valentine’s Day. For instance, one San Francisco library offered the first literary speed-dating event.
So there. I guarantee that you’ll have more fun coming up with your own list then you will have reading mine.
I decided I wanted to be Ace Frehley when I was about 9 years old. I mowed lawns and shoveled driveways for a year to buy my first shitty guitar and amp at the local music shop. If I only could have afforded lessons, I might have gotten good at it. In retrospect, it was worth doing it the way it was done!
Today, I’m thankful for the gift of time. I think that if one day in the past I’d been given a glimpse of myself walking into a hospice facility, my hands cradled around my big belly, I would have been crushed with anguish from that day onward. God only gives us a day at a time, the future is none of our business until it becomes the present. It’s comforting to know that even back in those tranquil, sunny days — God was already here ready to meet us, his arms outstretched offering to take this heavy load from us.
I hope you enjoyed a special Mother's Day.
Sweater Quest by Adrienne Martini
Antigua is a distant dream and as my list of things to do grow in my Filofax, I begin the countdown to surgery.
We had a little pot luck with the graduate council that was themed international. Logic states that I should have made something Vietnamese, but whatever, I like making cupcakes. I haven't had time to concoct red bean, mung bean, whatever bean with coconut cupcakes possibilities, so I did the next best thing: VANILLA COCONUT. YUM.
7 random facts about myself...
Me: How has your culture, or living in south Florida contributed to you artistic nature?
Now looking on it from the Cowboys’ side of things: this being the first game of the season, doesn’t make it by any means, a must win; but it would be for bragging rights, and hey, 1-0 is 1-0, right?
Of course, I wouldn't trade mine, or our nursing relationship, for the world.
There are so many recipes for vinaigrettes, and they're all a variation on the same ingredients. If you don't have a recipe, you might want to try this one by David Lebovitz.
Tomorrow, tweet with 1/2 of the original 25, and add 12 more people to add up to 25 people to correspond with again. Repeat that cycle daily. One-half from previous day combined with one-half new people (from your follower/following lists).
He was convicted of four counts of rape and five indecent assaults on two girls after he disappeared in October.
Jane Rogers, The Testament of Jessie Lamb: ""It is not to my mind a wholly achieved novel . . . to be fully realized as a work of speculative fiction it needs a wider canvas, a sense that larger events are mounting in the background."
Finally, I leave you with my geekiest YouTube ever.
E' interessante leggere il suo profilo, e vedere come lei sia arrivata ad aprire un blog.
This will be the final syncretism post. There may be other avenues to explore in this arena in the future, but for now, these are the only ones that I’ve been able to hunt down and find out anything definitive about; I have theories on several others, which I will not elaborate until I have established them in future publications.
Cost is $15 shipped first class. I will also email you sample cards I've made with these supplies for you to scrap-lift at home! You can purchase this class/kit by paying me through paypal! Click the Buy Now button below!
Find out here if the Sony DSC-T5 is right for you.
I smiled back.
Sierra Nevada Ovila Saison
Add Images as new Layers
Everything was blue and white and green and now no longer real
I have tried a more aggressive marketing approach, working faster, catering to what's popular...Yet none of it remained effective for longer than a week maybe.
Okay, this is a very short and non-funny post, because I wasted over half of this class period on a choir lesson. Ahh, who cares? You read me anyway!
First raised the revolt were the body-guards, which sought to capture the Palace of Emir Sheikh Hamad bin Khalifa Al-Thani.
4) Do this for each EVENT.
Train Conductors
My current car is a toyota matrix (not one of the recalled ones). I purchased it because the payment were less than my other car payment and I needed a smaller car payment so I could make a mortgage payment and not have to eat ramen noodles everyday. I bought it from a friend who sold it because they were getting a minivan to accommodate their growing family. It is a peppy, zippy little car and gets pretty fabulous mileage (bonus since I now commute 75 miles to work, each way, everyday). But I have no emotional attachment to this car. I needed a car and this one does the job. It’s just a car.
Actually, it’s THANKS TO THE WINDSPREN BECAUSE SHE IS LOVE.
Saudi Arabia. Wahhabists had trained activists to spread extreme interpretations of Islam within Ethiopia, and other forces, like AIAI, were also contributing to the problem. Meles said he was still optimistic that moderate Ethiopian Muslims could contain the spread of extremism and noted that one of the most modern interpretations of Islam had emerged in Lebanon through Ethiopian immigrants. The GOE had asked some to return to Ethiopia to promote moderation and tolerance. Sen. Feingold commented that the USG faced the same challenge of reaching out to moderate Muslims around the world.
The story itself is near flawless, from the perfectly timed trouble Jones encounters to the wit and humor woven throughout the story and the perfect amount of action and fight scenes. You are never lost due to complicated plot lines and too many things going on at once yet you are engrossed in the story from start to finish.
Hope everyone had a wonderful Mother's Day. (this is a card created with My Digital Studio)
Let's get it started in here!
Cinnamon Seed with Fir Needle
I hope you all have a spectacular week, and thanks so much for visiting! Oh, by the way, did you order your copy of A Compendium of Curiosities 2 yet? I'll be making an announcement about the new challenge later this week!!!
No flour is used for dusting the surface. You will have to grease the surface with very little oil and roll as thinly as possible. (My friend rolled out so thin that the dough looked transparent.)
Can soft as a baby’s skin
But it was no use. Ice Voice had hung up on me.
Step 1: Get plastic 'rouleaux' from your bank.
I hope you liked my picks from the Prismatic collection. Did you grab any of these glitter bombs or pass them by? By the way, these are top coat eaters. I used two thick coats of Seche Vite to get a smooth finish.
BLM's: If you've already experienced major holidays and that first year mark, please tell me how you did it. I just feel like it's going to be impossible the next few months.
* That - apart from the interview and the pieces agreed for possible publication - you will keep the exercises, discussion and other participants in confidence to ensure a safe place for everyone
May your soft breath steam with vengeance!
But over the years some things grew on me.
New York, NY – Modest Mouse hits the road this June for the Randalls Island, NYC Governors Ball Music Festival and the 2012 Orion Music + More festival in Atlantic City, NJ.
(to be continued)
As is clearly stated in the article, the traffic policemen did not issue the fine just because she was wearing a veil, but because they felt it interfered with her ability to drive safely.
Ate a giant lollipop.
Its hectic the sites you see there
I work in silence: I would find music of any sort distracting.
When you eat like a nutritarian "salad is the main dish". I eat salad at least once or twice every day, and I have to keep coming up with new salad recipes, or I get bored! Here's another healthy, nutritarian-style salad I've been enjoying lately: Mango & Grape Tomato Salad.
No puppies yet. However Ellie is really showing... Don't need a "Puppies on board" tee for HER! She'd chew it off anyway...
Why do the media treat religion with such contempt? If reporters don’t believe in God then that’s fine by me, but the contempt they report on religion with is saddening.
So what were the consequences of trying save a little bit of extra cash? The immediate consquence is that he couldn’t get his payroll paperwork in time, so he may not be able to start working or get paid right away. I’m not quite sure how much that will cost us. The long term consequence is the possibility of ID theft, and the headache of dealing with that down the road.
1) I feel like I have to finish EVERYTHING I EVER STARTED there before I leave. Which my French colleagues say is the exact OPPOSITE of what most people do in my position. What the effing-ef is wrong with me?
The first incline was frequently covered by rock slides, so they put in a really large set of fencing and rock blocks to hold the hillside back. I saw an interesting red flower, which I assume to be some sort of poppy. It's the first time I remember seeing this flower anywhere, and right along this incline was the only place I saw it today. I suspect they scattered some seeds for it during their last construction period here.
“How am I going to get any sleep when you’re making all that noise?” I asked. They quieted down, and hoped I’d fall asleep.
Oval Label Behind Ornament: Nestabilities
By this point, Loki had eaten a witch's heart, thereby gaining the blackness of her soul. Loki thusly changed his attitude toward the gods of the Norse pantheon--it was they who had killed the witch and burnt her corpse, and apparently her resentment lingered in her heart after her death. Mmm. Delicious hate.
Stitching of May's Word Play will begin this evening as I'm in front of the TV watching/listening to American Idol. I'm enjoying some TV as of late. The Voice on Monday evenings, followed by Smash, and then two evenings of Idol, and throw in a little Anderson Cooper too...the most prime time TV that I've watched in a very very long time.
I've been drawing again - this time I've done a few images which I really needed for my own cards and hope you'll find them useful too. I send a lot of Get Well cards, and needed some images which could be used for both male and female cards. This one is "Bunch of Grapes" and I've already coloured it in green, dark red and purple and am pleased with how it looks.
Since I was just doing a “dry run” and not a full-fledged shopping trip, at the first store I decided to get just one package of each item I had on my list to see how long it would take on average to navigate the aisles I needed to go to, then extrapolate that time over the number of stores I planned to visit — since food items are clustered together, I figured that the time spent picking up assorted non-food items around the store would be a better indication of how long it would take to navigate each store, then once I had picked up those items I would finish my shopping in the grocery section.
½ Tablespoon Kashmiri chilli powder
When the native language was used in rock-based pop music during the fifties no commentators gave it more concern as cultural production than the local production of Coca-Cola. During the seventies rock was increasingly recognised as an arena of language innovation, which put older pop lyrics in the native language in a new light. It became clear that even lyricists of ‘simple pop music’ had often been adapting the language to rock music in an innovative way and,furthermore, many of them had been verbalising daily experience and new developments in everyday culture that had been left alone by the serious culture and by serious rock music (Nielsen, 1980). While ‘progressive rock music’ had been claiming access to high culture in the late 1960s and early 1970s, the boundaries between high and low were getting more blurred in the late 1970s.
1. An exaggerated sense of self-importance, i.e. a sense of self-importance that is not matched by actual performance.
Also, if I’m up North and a snowmobiler is crossing in front of me, I’ve got no business on the road anyway! I should be parked till the snow is gone! My mama didn’t raise no fool!
This blog is now officially retired and I will no longer be posting here.
What I love most is it doesn’t make me appear like I’m wearing blush, but still manages to make my face look damn good! Now that’s a feat =)
Moreover, the same could well prove true in Lebanon, where Israel fought a limited war against Hezbollah in 2006, but refrained from an all-out campaign to destroy the organization for the same reason it refrained in Gaza two years later. Since then, according to Israeli intelligence, Hezbollah has tripled its missile arsenal, making it far more dangerous. Far worse, however, is that with chaos reigning in Syria, Israel now fears Hezbollah could acquire some of Syria’s chemical weapons, plus other arms more advanced than anything it has now. If so, the price of defeating Hezbollah in the future will also be far higher than it would have been in 2006.
Everett (age 4): Doo. The grass here is green. And Mommy’s here and she’s a girl and (meeting my eyes with a dimpled smile) SHE is pretty.
Eyes that always smiled,
Using the pictures
Physicians Formula’s Shimmer Strips are by no means new products, in fact I had seen them around during my previous trips to the US. Just that I never really got around to hauling them so this time round, I’m making up for lost time. lol..
but for the short distance from 37th and O Streets
The cover is a work in progress... my girl is still to be finished... as is the background... I want to stamp in some words like 'the doorway to your imagination'... around the door and staircase... did I mention how much fun I am having... yes... I think I did :))
MEETING POINT: South Beach (two blocks from Ocean Drive, exact location disclosed with ticket purchase).
I cannot believe that it is already time for me to tell you guys my favorites from November.
So: Try and finish all new writing by Sunday morning, type the remaining edits on Sunday and Monday, print out the full new version Monday night, perform fiendishly intense copy-edit on Tuesday, type revisions and do a final proof before sending to E. on Wednesday afternoon. This schedule may be impossibly compressed; if I have to, I'll take the manuscript with me to Cayman on Thursday and finish up with proofreading and corrections on Friday during the day. I would prefer to be done by Wednesday evening but Friday end of day will certainly do.
1 situation--his
Lip Pencil (Coffee Cafe)
I have mentioned in previous posts that I was tested for Sleep Apnea a while ago. The results came in and I am not surprised that I have Sleep Apnea.
So whilst not quite as diverse as its predecessor, ‘Doll Revolution’, this album is still a worthwhile addition to the Bangles’ catalogue. It shows a determined move away from trying to ‘modernise’ their sound and instead it builds on their strengths of strident retro guitars and Beach Boy harmonies and reinforces their modern psychedelic take on today’s music structures, evoking a late sixties mood which I rather like. In truth it is still growing on me. A keeper.
Not to say that I stole someone’s sermon, changed a few words around and called it my own revelation from God, but rather how many ideas, stylistic moves, modes of storytelling and actual stories have come from others that I’ve encountered along the way.
However, if tomorrow you turn on the news and hear a report that a ninety mile wide asteroid is on collision path with planet Earth which will end in ball of flames next Thursday, that clattering you hear will be me rushing to the nearest tobacconist, before calling in at the liqueur store via my favourite chocolate shop.
He opened the door and left.
Our conversation went something like this:
Enjoy your Sunday and if possible prep your food in advance.
This week has been the usual mad mix of making that is my life! I started off with a hanging mushroom decoration that was a custom order. I was asked for a lime green door, tulips, lots of hearts, a gingerbread man, cupcakes in green cases and hearts for the spots! A lot for a little mushroom but not for a bigger one so a bigger one it became. I used little heart buttons to make some bunting around the roof and for the gingerbread man's buttons and a black bead for the door handle. It's bigger than the usual and measured 6 x 6 inches.
I was wearing my Italian soccer jersey, so instantly the woman cutting my hair commented, both to me and the guy cutting hair next to her. Then we all started speaking Italian about how Gli Azzurri (the Italian soccer team) are amazing, and hail to the victors, and we'll get another Cup, and let's go grab some cannoli, etc. etc. Then I find out that the woman cutting my hair is Greek Orthodox - wasn't a huge surprise given her accent - and we talk all about that, and her grandchildren's picky diets, and spanakopita, and damned those South Koreans for beating Greece 2-0. Although I was mildly confused when she kept speaking Spanish to other people. She caught on that I understood her when I couldn't stop laughing at her heckling of the guy at the cash register. It was like I had my very own ethnically confused Yaya cutting my hair. When I left I tipped her and said "Kali Nikta" (goodnight in Greek). She got really tickled and said "Oh! Look at you! Kali nikta!"
Solar flares,
Rudy programmed this for Saturday so we could complete it all. I was over in Miami though and wasnt able to go about it until yesterday. I only was able to get the first three done yesterday then did the 5th workout today because it has a shit load of deep handstand push ups in it with running…and that is something I can always work on.
The freezer on the other hand.... well lets just say Im glad Ive spent way too much time playing Tetris throughout my life.... Tomorrow is football/laundry day so I bet I can get the freezers straighted out...
But remember...
And now he’s back with Locked Down, which for my money is the best album he’s done in decades. The music recalls his early work, but it has a sharp contemporary edge — for which we can thank producer Dan Auerbach, frontman of The Black Keys. But unlike some older artists produced by hip young bucks — for example, Wanda Jackson on some tracks on her recent Jack White-produced album — Dr. John doesn’t feel like a fish out of water here. The music is fresh, not forced.
Two Muslim protesters were arrested for public order offences.
I'll start with the second question because I already answered it in another of these posts: HECK YES we always have breakfast. Do _I_ always have it? Er. But the kids always do. Always! ...Although, this is not the superhuman feat I'm implying, because so far only one of them has ever wanted to skip breakfast, and we've let him try skipping and then he's complaining he's hungry when it's still 2 hours until lunch.
About the Show
We also gave our costume a neck collar with a pink rose like Vicky’s, which really sets off the costume.
I was sure that I stuffed up---well, the interviewer told me---but I thought that I might as well find out where I went wrong.
This series is about leadership and this is the first time I am moving away from offering my thoughts on how CIOs (and others) can apply these leadership practices within their own businesses. The main reasoning is that, I will from now on leave it to my readers to apply what they have learnt from my blog posts. I am increasingly conscious that my readership now envelops many disparate disciplines and I am grateful for that. It has always been my intention that I disseminate my knowledge to others who may benefit as well. After all, knowledge taken to the grave is knowledge lost!
Three Points Design's hand-carved wooden owls, whales, and feathers stood out from the sea of crap like a beacon of Etsy-worthy goodness. I loved all the owl statues and the giant carved mermaid, but what really caught my eye was a wooden owl head flanked by wings, about two-feet across. I just knew he'd be perfect above Jack's crib (a spot I've always been too paranoid to hang something, but I finally feel fairly confident that no freak earthquake is going to cause Jack to be smooshed during the night). I hemmed and hawed, walked away and came back, and finally committed. And oh, how I love him!
And when you get the chance
Recently, a couple of fellow indie authors received a negative review by someone who purports herself to be a professionally “honest and fair” reviewer. This person not only critiques books, but also is a panelist for a well-known independent literary award. To me, this is a conflict of interests mostly because you’re not really critiquing, you’re judging. This reviewer (who shall remain nameless), cannot in her own words “separate the author from the fiction he/she is writing”; so, how can she be trusted to remember to take of her judge “hat” and put on her “critic” hat?
Photographic Opportunities
I frowned. Had he of a whim inherited his father’s freak-out over chicken and sausages? Listeria Hysteria? It was true that I was grappling with a punnet of chicken breasts and mashing them into a marinade – I can all but hear the noise of E fainting somewhere in cyber-space. If there’s one thing the man can’t abide it’s a spot of meat handling. Ideally, when it takes place, he should be in another county and under mild sedation. I should be clad in hairnet and latex, a floor length apron, and enter a sterilised zone via a holding cell where I would be whooshed with a big shower spray and doused with an antiseptic douche, preferably one not wildly available in this country due to its nuking capabilities. All instruments to be sterilised after use.
The leadership of Unite has correctly branded this as "obscene" but Len McLusky's solution is to give greater power to shareholders to curb directors' pay. One can't help wondering why a trade union leader isn's saying "what about the workers?" It is no use for union leaders to stop short in pious trepidation before the power of big business. The workers in these corporations could give you a very accurate picture of how much use these directors are and whether they should be given house-room let alone a salary.
His surgery is scheduled for next Wednesday.
Of course, it was obvious to everyone that mum was paralytic drunk. She was flopped down in the cushions with the world a blurred view through top and bottom eyelashes. In front of the whole family Helen bit the bullet and came out with it.
"Anna Karenina is beautiful, married to a successful man, and has a son whom she adores. But a chance meeting at a train station in Moscow sets her passionate heart alight, and she is defenceless in the face of Count Vronsky's adoration. Having defied the rules of 19th-century Russian society, Anna is forced to pay a heavy price. " Tolstoy is a breeze compared with Dostoevsky, and the story is engaging and easy to follow, despite its length - a mammoth 35½ hours. Luckily I had plenty of car journeys, and it was the ideal accompaniment to painting the kitchen ceiling. While Anna, her husband and Vronsky feature quite a lot, there are plenty of other stories going on - Anna's brother and his sister-in-law have their own adventures, of equal interest. I was given a print version long, long ago as a school prize, and I'm sure I read it too, but at that age I certainly didn't gain any insight into the Russian world at that period - land economy, a shooting party, local politics, class distinctions - and I'm sure I missed some points on this reading that a Russian or historical scholar would notice. It tails off rather than ending, but apart from that it was a good read.
Alguazil
The CD's sound quality was meh, however. While obviously soundboard, and from a master, the "mastering" - or what passes for it - is shit. It's been so long - 17 years? - since I've heard the original LP pressing that I have not a clue if the CD is faithful or not. Regardless, the CD mastering needs a fair bit of help.
This is Beltane when the door to summer opens and all the beauty of vibrant new life awaits us in the merry month of May - hopefully with rather more in the way of blue skies and sunshine than we've seen lately:) For the ancient Celts the day ran from sunset to sunset which is why this post appears on the 30th April:) So onward we go for
I guess I would call this surprisingly healthy-ish. It has a good amount of sugar, but you can feel free to reduce. I halved this recipe and it still made 24 muffins. You can also make a banana bread loaf with a crunchy cinnamon sugar top (in the directions below). In fact, if you feel like it, sprinkle some cinnamon sugar over the top of the muffins and they’ll also be crunchy and yummy.
There is a continuing confusion in the public mind between Frankenstein and his creature. Which is ironic in a way - Victor Frankenstein being the true monster of the novel.
1: No retirement savings. No 401K. No inheritance. Nada. Zip. Zilch. Once we quit working and the paychecks stop coming in, we are well and truly fucked. We are all living paycheck to paycheck so the end will come swiftly and without mercy.
i may have to go back over there sometime and get pictures of the inside to share with you.....
Sometimes yes, and sometimes not. It all depends on what it is. I personally am hesitant to make them finish, since I believe that it fostered a need for me to finish everything on my plate when I don’t need to if I am full.
Exposing myself to the Sun in small increasing increments so that I have a slight color to my skin has seemed to help a great deal when I find myself caught out without adequate skin protection.
Im rambling I know.. But does anyone know how we figure out what we want to do? or be? I mean yes, we can make a list of the things we like and that we do well.. and that's all well and good in theory, but how do we KNOW what will keep us happy?
Charlie And The Chocolate Factory is a perennial favorite, but I have never enjoyed it so much as when read by Eric Idle. You will be giggling and salivating by turns. Good for a road-trip, when snack rules are relaxed and lollies are on hand....
Mr Young and I are country mice, on our way to be capital city mice today. Privately, so near to Christmas, I can’t help thinking this is likely to by Death by Oxford Street; a few swift blows to the kidneys by designer-clad elbows and then trampled on by Jimmy Choos once I’m down.
We see Professor, but surely, brewers wouldn't call their beer Real Ale if it wasn't?
Sometimes, in desperation, he’dlook
The DOJ has stepped into a business it doesn’t understand at all, and it is tilting the outcome against those who are trying to play by the rules.
What made interviewing these bands so special, was their willingness to submit to the interview, and in a way – the interviewer. They liked the different approach I took with the questions I asked, and they had no problem venturing into unknown territory with the answering thereof. I guess, what was key here, was the fact that they were open to release new information.
“Our kind don’t mix well. Trouble.”
Yeah, I know it looks suspicious, him being married to me, but it's true.
Traditionally pork ribs are used but I used chicken instead to better promote this delicious dish to my Muslim readers. The broth is the soul of the dish so do be patient and wait for the rewarding result.
It was pretty mellow when I first got down to Frank Ogawa Plaza, people hanging out in the grass, painting signs, passing out fliers and what not, but then a large crowd of protesters came running down Broadway back towards the park with riot police in pursuit and it devolved into chaos in a matter of seconds! Police were scuffling with a few people trying to make arrests and the crowd responded by throwing water bottles and paint at officers and the police fired back with flash grenades and tear gas. I also had the distinct displeasure of watching a man get tazered right in front of me as 3 officers wrestled to subdue him. That photo got the front cover of the SF Chronicle. Read the article here: Thousands March in Oakland…
Sheer short sleeve shirt, Topshop €55
Lisa :) - 56
* Cuttlebug embossing folder: D'vine Swirls, Swiss Dots
inhaling reminiscent blooms
Okay. So I’m working on a short story that sort of revolves around music and also revolves around a deaf character. I was just looking up general information about working deaf musicians and schools and a bunch of other information and, there’s not a whole lot out there. It goes from angelfire sites to yahoo answers to academic papers that I have to pay for. I was looking for information by deaf people or hard of hearing people and wasn’t getting a whole bunch. There are so many first hand accounts of hearing people talking about music and music education and meaningful impact and stuff, why so hard to find deaf musician information. Shoot, even just finding modern deaf musicians is difficult. (then I found a bunch of white people and two black rappers). The few schools I found info on were totally all white, which brings up other issues entirely.
So what do you think? What have you made of Bath’s season? Why have they underperformed over the course of the season? Who should take the helm at the Rec? Leave a comment and let us know your views.
If you had a room 3.7 x 3.7 x 2.1 metres the area carbon dioxide would occupy in that room would be .25 x .25 x .17m or the size of a large packet of cereal.
Again Minerva took the floor.
Lately, my rides have been short (between 6 and 15 miles) and kept within the city limits. I have been spending more time exploring the bike boulevards of Berkeley, which are picturesque and calm with wide roads and amazing houses all around. The only sounds I have to accompany me are birds and the click of my chain and cassette, both of which are gentle and unobtrusive. I have been riding these streets with friends mostly, but want to get there solo and take some photos. There will be a longer post on this part of the world later, when there is photographic, rather than only anecdotal, evidence of its loveliness.
26. Unschooling parents do not choose this path out of a desire to be contrary or lazy.
of us.
-Composition Book
This is one of their originals. It’s a track called Better Times.
But here I am, typing away aimlessly, having not showered, nor changed my clothes, nor really done anything of use since my last interview. I didn’t get the job. Could have been any number of reasons, ranging from my appearance to lack of experience. It was for a fitness trainer job. They would have had paid to train me and I would have been able to walk away with a certification, which I could have turned into my own business if I had liked. It would have been a lot of fun. I miss exercising. I feel weak and malnourished. I shouldn’t. I really have money that would sustain me at a nice lifestyle for at least another year. I hate playing the pauper when I’m a king. I don’t want to go out and party, because I’ve seen what Hollywood does to people like that. Nothing gets done that way. Soon, very soon, I will be in a much better position; I won’t be wandering any more, and I’ll be able to really get down to business, not looking for dead end jobs that I don’t want. I can go out and meet people again. I can own a vehicle again.
-irish curse is avoided with a pin attempt!
“One-off” PM
Exposure to surface water from Pohatcong and Shabbecong creeks should not have an impact on cancer risk, according to the health department release.
My next post today is regarding the Pokerspace school. This is a great place to come, when you want to try and improve your game. Its important to say, that you will never ever become a master of the game, and that you will always be learning, but some feel they were god’s gift to poker, and think they have mastered the game, and he is no other then Phil Helmuth.
Meanwhile, NBC News reported Monday that a law enforcement source told the network that all Secret Service personnel had been given copies of Obama's schedule, which they were told to lock in their hotel room safe — raising the possibility of a security breach. The source spoke on condition of anonymity.
Stone surmises that the metal particles in the trails "dope" the sky, turning it into a vast semiconductor so that HAARP technology can be deployed to trigger earthquakes, volcanic eruptions, floods, droughts, and other destructive freak weather
Let's get back to the subject of WAGs for a moment. I naturally went searching for information about the WAGs of my favorite sports team, the New York Yankees, and found a slide show on the New York Daily News website titled "Meet the Yankee WAGs." Click here and you can check out all 47 slides if you so desire.
journal spot is from Ruby Rock-It. The Maya Road chippies I have colored with
We, as a family, don't embrace or practice any one religion. Even when I had a religious practice, it wasn't one that had any overt rituals -- many discreet, personal ones, but not really any big celebrations. At first, it was enough just to separate ourselves from the trappings of that religion. In the years since, tho, I've wondered if we're all missing something, by not keeping to many -- if any -- of the cultural traditions we both grew up with. We've never made a big fuss about Santa or the Easter Bunny, or even the Tooth Fairy. I'm sure my mom-in-law thinks I'm somewhat remiss in those areas.
Dishes are clean, burnt lightbulbs are changed, and the laundry is finished. I may now blog in peace.
Tragic, right? Queen of sparkles can't get her bling on with her arms anymore.
My thoughts race
*Analytical programmer to provide statistical analysis, programming, and data management support for autism epidemiologic studies.
This culture of Islam — Europe’s new Nazi party — is growing as we are shrinking and poses a clear and present danger to our children and grandchildren. It is genocidal in its ambitions, which effectively means that indigenous Europeans would, if Islam came to power, be the new Jews of Hitler’s Germany. Each and every one of us; homosexual and heterosexual, feminist and housewife, Jew, Catholic, Protestant, agnostic or atheist, conservative or liberal, black or white.
"A shot was fired and hit her in the lower body and she drove on into London Road, but the car stopped and was found idling. Paramedics tried to resuscitate her, but she was later confirmed dead at the scene," said police spokesman Inspector Moses Maphakela.
Since she loves butterflies as well as birds, I spray painted the little bird cage that I had white, and hung it from the ceiling. ( She later said this was her favorite part). See the birdcage on the top of the above picure?
FRCKIN’ FOURTH, PEOPLE!
Today we look into the life of Daniel. We specifically look at this young man that had a choice to honor God or honor the king. Oh how I pray that our sons would be like Daniel…right?
It’s interesting that spirit and spiritually does become clearer and the mist-ry is no longer with clearer vision.
There are a lot of advantages of being in one of these networks. We can find the long lost friends with whom we used to share our tiffinn in kindergarten. We can come across the very old teachers who taught us the basics of alphabets whose face we hardly remembered. Every forgotten memoir of school and college can be revived being in these sites. We no more need to wait for hours just to hear the voices of our loved ones over the phone. The video chatting has made everything so easier that we can eat, dance and sing together with the ones thousand miles away. Festivals aren’t going to disappoint us anymore even if we are in foreign lands away from our families. For we can celebrate together, play cards, share photos, thoughts and wishes with every one we like to. Social networks have been a boon for every lonely heads in the city.
For we are His workmanship, created in Christ Jesus for good works,
At Sleepy Hollow Country Club, Par 35
I yelled, “Yeh there, now your cane has pooh all over it! and you have dog dirt on your hand, pooh head!”
Jameson
Some of the relationships I've had have left me rather cynical, but at the same time I think that I just haven't met anyone truly compatible, or maybe never found true love, and I'd like to think I can put a YET on the end of that.
soft and warm and cozy.
We.”
Caramelizing the Molds
Have I got a solution for you.
I think this technique will become increasingly important in the next few years as climate patterns change and we experience more droughts throughout the continent. It also just makes your tomatoes taste better, I hear. Combined with other principles for reducing irrigation (lots of organic matter, mulching, contour, and polycrops), we can have some almost effortless gardens that build soil and biodiversity, and grow damn tasty food.
Their family is soon split, his parent's separation announced matter-of-factly whilst dealing with a shopping list. The time that Karl Ove spends alone with his father is painfully intimate at times, as when he catches his father in moments when he thinks he is alone. Returning home early for example to find him nursing a bottle of wine (and making plenty of noise as he enters in order to announce his presence so that his father can clear it away) or another occasion when even his attempt at a noisy entrance cannot rise above the loud music to which his father is listening; eyes closed, head moving to and fro with the music, cheeks wet with tears. Young Karl Ove walks out unnoticed and leaves the house immediately. His father eventually removes himself to his own mother's seaside home where he slowly drinks himself to an early grave. It is the cleanup after his death which dominates the second half of the book and it is a truly stunning piece of writing that takes squalor and destruction and turns it into art.
Today I need to start our Bologna ‘hot list’. The book fair is only a month away, and Sarah and I will sit side by side and pitch our new projects like demons. So much fun.
Can you imagine for one instant that the US Federal government would seek to overturn a trial verdict had the races been reversed? Hell would freeze over before the FBI, who still refuse to look into the attempted rail-roading of three white lacrosse players in Durham, North Carolina in 2006, took such action in relation to black or Hispanic defendants acquitted of killing a white man. Indeed, there would be riots in the streets if they did.
I was given a few recipe books to get me started, and that's where these Turkey and Bean Tostadas came from. I made them gluten free by using corn shell tostadas, and the chili beans were gluten free. Please note the nutritional info is for flour tortillas (I am learning about that as well for everything I eat). These were really good, everyone ate them and Mr. said he even enjoyed them. That means it's a keeper. BUT, I think I'll make them hard tacos, eating a "flat taco" tostada is a little tricky, especially with the little ones. =)
Ehud made himself a sword which had two edges, a cubit in length, and he bound it on his right thigh under his cloak.
I would be pleased to send a partial or complete manuscript of WINNING THE WAR AT HOME for your review. Thank you for your consideration.
Moves in for
So many great beers, I can't wait to see what El Toro does next.
And the side view...silver shells along the bottom, and ripped papers to make the waves and the sea...made my own corrugated strips....inked the sky with my TEMPLATE watch the video, really good...quite a few have asked me how I do my sky, and this is where I learned...with Bev Rochester...just click the link [I hope]..lol..
juice and zest of half a lemon
Yeah, why not?
So you are probably wondering what has happened since I started to de-clutter.
but the boys and I did get out to do a few fun things
It's that time of year again! When parents and kids are getting geared for the kids to head back to school. I know I'm ready to get back in the swing of things.
I'd been noticing a few people Tweeting about a book they liked. I downloaded a free sample, and I liked it! So I bought The Hunger Games.
So happy to have been a part of it all in that spectacular church.
The joy freedom and potentiality of the Maiden can
Pain killers are on the menu every 5 hours, along with something to counteract the nausea I get from those meds. I'm a sensitive girl, you know...
In my experience when I was feeling very anxious about something or a situation, when I choose to fully embrace and share how I was feeling, the interesting thing was that the anxious feeling changed. In my life I have found that some people have moved away or out of my life and others have moved closer to me as a result of being authentic.
She would force me to take my clothes off, and stand naked in front of her. Then she would tie my hands behind my back and push me down to her feet. I would lick her feet and up her legs and under her skirt where she would have no panties. She would force my head between her legs and make me lick her pussy. After that she would put on a strap on and make me suck her. I would not be allowed to fuck her. She would then force my head down to the ground and ass in the air. She would reach behind me with a lubed up finger and insert it into my ass. After I was good and lubed she would come behind me and fuck me hard. That is my ultimate fantasy.
1 - Go to wikipedia and hit random. The first random wikipedia article you get is the name of your band. 2 - Go to quotationspage.com and hit random. The last four or five words of the very last quote of the page is the title of your first album. 3 - Go to flickr and click on “explore the last seven days”. Third picture no matter what it is, will be your album cover. 4 - Use photoshop or similar (picnik.com is a free online photo editor) to put it all together. 5 - Upload it to the photo hosting site of your choice and post a link in the comments.
Who held Christ in his hand.
Today I am wearing a pair of jeans I have not put on
“Declaration of Independence”
As annoying as that is, though, it’s inconsequential besides the morally bankrupt philosophy behind the device. Since cops already have their own methods of doing this, the target purchasers must be wives and parents (who stand more to lose from spying than from their husbands or kids looking at porn) and employers (who are pretty desperate if they can’t think of a better reason to fire somebody than that). Am I wrong, or is this a symptom of a serious social illness?
As you can see breakfast gives us a lot of benefits. Now you know what it is called the most important meal of the day.
Heat the oil in a kadai and add the mustard seeds.
There will always be what if questions. What if I had gone to the WNBA? What if I wrote a best-selling book www.identitycrisisbook.com ? What if I had never been molested, or raped?
Eventually gravity had her way and head relaxed completely as well.
One of the most over-hyped over self-promoted breweries ever. Yes, I like the label art. The beer just never has matched it.
This giveaway is open to US only. Please leave a seperate comment for each entry. This giveaway will end on April 20 and the winners will be selected by random.org. Please make sure to leave your email or have your email available in your profile to contact you if you are the winner.
my hair and
Alright, maybe not. But I don’t like it.
Twenty-nine Catholic bishops, including six archbishops want 1.3 million hectares of haciendas distributed to farmers. Hinay-hinay lang po… buhay pa si Tita Cory.
It's wonderful when you get a bunch of readers who know your books and ask specific questions like, "why did you make so-and-so do that?" or "Is such-and-such really evil?"
I knew, even before reading the tag, that this May Day bag (basket) came from my friends Tammy and Jesse and their children, Noah, Hannah, Jack and Amelia.
Ironically the man that should be his chief rival, Dayron Robles, has somewhat mirrored his accomplishments of late. In '07 Robles broke through to the sub13 ranks with a sterling 12.92 - equaling Liu's '07 world leader. In the Olympic season with Liu on the shelf injured, Robles broke Liu's WR by .01 with his 12.87. He followed up by going to Beijing and won gold in 12.93 - Liu won his in 12.91! Finally, this year, while Liu was rehabbing, Robles suffered through injuries of his own - leading to a World Championships final without either athlete on the track.
The complete opposite in terms of personality, but no less alluring when it came to tickling the fancies of those with swelling genitals, Joanna, a curly-haired single mother who's terrified of snakes, is the genuine heroine of the piece. It's true, some of the fellas try to fill that role from time to time, but I found Ben to be overly timid, Jerry was too bland, and Zach, well, his complete and total lack of sideburns hampered every attempt I made to evaluate the spiritual makeup of his character. No, I'd say Jackie Wray's performance was the most conventionally tolerable out of all the professional and nonprofessional actors who appear throughout The Tower.
There was JUST barely enough to make this maxi out of.
While running the diagnostics and installing the downloads, I was asked about any other problems. When I mentioned the sticky keys (l, q, a, s, u, m, v) Vinnie said they'd send me a new keyboard module for my Inspiron 1720. He had me remove & replace the existing one so that I'd know how to put the new one in once it arrives (in 2-3 working days) before I send the old one back. Interestingly, the 'l' key no longer sticks at all but the 'h' key does ... strange, right? Annoying too because BOTH keys get lots of use when I type. Several others continue to stick intermittently so I'll be glad to get this issue resolved.
Aliens = 1 objective; Colonial Marines = 2 objectives (for the win)
“Well, no need to get hostile; I was just trying to get some better weapons. A well-armed group like yours may be alright, but we have to watch for gangs and other raiders. It’s all fine and dandy for you soldiers, but us regular folks do not have weapons like yours. We have to keep the looters, crazies, KCAP-infected cannibals, and the damn white slavers away with what we have.”
Talking about taggie/textures, Lil got an awesome texture/taggie quilt from her Auntie Ashley for Christmas! Such a sweet gift and she seems to enjoy grabbing at the different textures. Jezebel would also like one for Christmas, she has been found attempting to nap on the taggie blanket! (ohmygosh, I love Lil’s hand on Jezzie here… they really are BFFs.)
and health professionals to plan together how we do this. We will focus
The title of this entry “How blogging improved my writing, and what it can do for yours” is specific. You already know what it’s all about and it tells you everything you can expect. I liken specific titles to the taglines you see on product packagings and websites. It allows the readers to choose what they read and saves them time from reading an entry they can’t relate to.
Programming leadership at Hot 96.7 said the station is laser beam targeted to appeal to the millennial listener. “Hot 96.7 is a result of extensive research to provide a reflection of the market area. It has been carefully crafted to offer a wide variety of contemporary hit music from the pop, rhythm, and alternative musical genres,” said Brad Austin, Hot 96.7 Program Director and the Music Director of the new station’s format.
And does anyone else out there have a writing mascot they would be prepared to share?
Samantha Bennett is finally going to get a solid job that will help her prove to her father that she's capable of succeeding on her own. Too bad it turns out her competition is none other than Dean Malloy, the boy her broke her heart 5 years ago and she's never gotten over. While they wait to find out who will win the contract, the two spend an electric weekend together--but will they really be able to go their separate ways at the end?
I'll never forget the day it all came out. I hadn't seen him much for the last few days and he asked to meet up after work. He was sat with a pint when I arrived and jumped up to get me one as soon as I came in.
The top three in no particular order for this challenge are:
It’s just another day on the Enterprise, except that Spock is in an extremely pissy mood. Nurse Chapel brings him some soup and he chases her from his room, throwing the purple glop against the wall opposite his quarters in a fit of rage, and then requests a leave of absence on Vulcan when Kirk questions him about why he’s being a dick. Kirk says fine (although he’s a nosy dick about it – it’s as if he has to be the best at everything, even ass*leness) but Starfleet orders them to Altair 6 RIGHT FRACKING NOW so Kirk tells Spock he has to wait and redirects the course. Spock says fine, and then changes Kirk’s orders. So Kirk is all, “Oh no you didn’t,” and changes their course back, only to change it again when McCoy tells Kirk if they don’t get to Vulcan RIGHT FRACKING NOW TIMES 2 Spock is gonna die because he has a build-up of “adrenaline” in his system that will kill him if it’s not “balanced” back out.
Check out this intriguing video by Gabe Lyons, one of the leading Christian experts on the church’s role in today’s culture. He presents a compelling vision of how Christians should engage society and help to transform it at the same time.
It's an amazing fact: there have only been four brewers in the twenty year history of Broad Ripple Brewpub. Ted Miller, Brewing Business Unit Leader for Brugge Brasserie - Indiana Region, was Broad Ripple Brewpub's third brewmaster. As we approach BRBP's 20th Anniversary Party on Sunday, we are happy to present a six pack interview with him.
"Jack Layton and much of his caucus are strong feminists."In the light of revelations about Mr.Layton's choice of massage parlour, it may be true that he believes women should have a stronger hand in government.
Secondly, getting people to work. This president has failed the American people.
He commented, “It’s been a while since my last role as a human being. You’ll meet me behind closed doors!”
When you try to cut out an entire food group, like carbohydrates, it’s highly likely that your thoughts about food will increase:
Hall closets on the right, kitchen door on the left.
STEPHENSON L. Vaccinating health care workers for influenza - a real patient safety issue. Iowa Med 2004; 94: 24-26.
“Two timing rat!” she screamed, irate,
Reviewed by Larry Jackson for the Association for Mormon Letters
Today she needed someone to pick up two kids that had just moved into the complex this past week....so I picked them up. As I was driving to church I was trying to talk with the new kids...asking how they liked their new apartment...tried to tell them that they would like their new school, what grade my daughter was in....and I said something about their parents and the little eight year old boy said something that pierced my heart.....
The ability to ask open-ended questions is very important in many vocations, including education, counselling, mediation, sales, investigative work and journalism.
My Mocha Imperial Stout and Scottish 90 Ale are on tap and delicious. (My "Scottish 90" is just slightly stronger than an 80, hence the name). The Stout has a very complex taste profile. Or at least that's what some homebrewing buddies and a few "red wine snobs" have told me. I just know that I like it a lot. The Scottish has exquisite mouthfeel and flavor. Both of these brews are exceptionally tasty. I limit myself to up to one 12-ounce glass per day, to prevent "self-mummification."
O Nightingale, catch me his strain!
Flarf Orchestra is one of several configurations from Gardner's
So, that's that. I probably won't update toooo much on this endeavor, because like I said, it's nothing particularly earth-shattering and I'm sure you're all sick of hearing I've dumped Fat Ass on his, well... Fat Ass again. So, I'll try to keep the weighty subjects to a minimum and write about more important things, like Chuck Bass and my list of HGCs. And with any luck, I will one day introduce you all to my newest interest:
.5 lb American Chocolate Malt
These crucial seconds included a scene of a police officer apparently shooting at peaceful civilians and also statements by demonstrators explaining why they had taken to the streets to protest at election rigging.
As a routine practical, one of our teachers actually told us to “kill” a frog by our own hands… it was harder to handle the live frog because of its slimy legs. The frog knew very well of its fate and some even jumped away from our hands the moment we held them. We were suppose to kill it, manually, not by any drugs.. and then all of a sudden the teacher banged the head of the frog on the table corner and told us to do the same…He also mentioned, “keep banging his head until you see its tongue come out..”… Yucckk!!
I'm not quite back into the swing of things yet. I managed to hurt my ankle pretty badly on Wednesday and I'm still catching up on laundry, but I'm getting there and I finally made those Space Camp reservations for the girls that I looked into before all of this happened.
The grain is delivered straight to the brewery – no far-off third party processing here – in big trucks where it travels through systems that are little changed from the days when a horse and cart would have done the same. It is steeped and kilned and stored on site until it makes its way to the Brewhouse to become the beer that has been a Tasmanian staple since the early 1800s and a favourite on the mainland since Cascade Premium Lager landed in 1985 to challenge the reign of the prevailing brews.
no direction..
-- Mark Twain
I take a mental snapshot to freeze this moment in time, finding joy in the mundane.
But in this day and age, I’ve still noticed that Spanish mothers seem quite concerned about wet hair. For example, in the fall, when the kids were taking swimming lessons at the sports club next to their school, some mothers would lie in wait in the coffee bar so they could spot their children returning to class. Once they started coming down the hall, they would jump up and go to feel their kid’s hair to ensure it was really dry and give them heck if it wasn’t. Sometimes they’d been asked by other mothers to check on other kids also, so they had to feel a couple kids’ heads. I was astounded when I saw this behaviour. I mean the kids were not even going to go outside – they go through a tunnel right back to their heated classrooms.
Now, they courted well, and they courted dearly
Hi Everyone, I know it's been a while since I posted anything, but I've been very busy on a very important project.
that starts April 1st.
To reach the milestone the Taiwanese power-player killed 390,895 creatures, accumulated 7,255,538,878 points of damage, completed 5,906 quests (that's 14.62 quests per day, apparently), raided 405 dungeons and hugged 11 players.
Fun time painting.... I think EVERY artist should enter this challenge!
Welcome back to another Craft Your Passion Monday Challenge!! I loved looking at all the cute entries from last weeks photo Inspiration and seeing how you were all inspired differently!!
AFAR magazine is filled with some of the most inspiring travel writing and photography I’ve ever seen. It’s well worth the $4.99. I love the articles and they have them for all different kinds of travelers. For those who are into backpacking, eating your way across countries, and anything else you can think of. They’re really amazing and I’m hoping to pull more from them in my blog because it’s GREAT advice!
I just got home from historic Charleston, SC. What an amazing city - the history and architecture is one-of-a-kind!
Enlisting some of Korea’s top Hallyu stars, Lotte created a visual experience that many of us have never witnessed before in a commercial.
So the only thing left was just fatigue, and they called these the Oxford criteria and to make sure that there would be absolutely no one with ME selected by using the Oxford criteria they specifically excluded anybody with any neurological symptoms. So a six year old can see that the CBT psychiatrists have deliberately selected people without ME yet labelled them as ME/CFS as we have just recently seen again in the PACE trial.
I mean the way they behaved.
I guess I am going to go with a Dog. I love some of the exotic animals out there but a dog is a mans best friend right :)
Included at the end of the book is an excellent collection of notes by the author on the various fairy tales that were woven into his, and on the meanings behind them.
They tried too hard and they blew it.
Not only was it something I could get for free with my level 6 points, but she said it ABSOLUTELY looks natural. I put it on after I got home and showered and I was pleasantly surprised! It had a nice scent (not nasty like most self-tanners) and a nice instant bronzer. Not to mention it didn't come off on my clothes at all the rest of the day. This is a great product and I will definitely continue using it!!
J. Job title: Food & Beverage Assistant. Which is really just a fancy way of saying 'waitress'.
The secret is out of the bag for everyone and the best part is that there are lots of issues that are raised with it but I hope its not going to be a case of simply revealing the identity and getting by with whatever has happened. It would be best if they addressed the whole issue in practical terms. In the end everyone is going to rejoice in many ways on the fact that Seung Yeon is a girl but whats needed most is that the problems she caused by dressing up as a guy and posing as such should be negated somehow. I’m eagerly waiting to see how the whole thing unfolds between her and the other M2 Junior members since characteristically they are the main part of the whole drama and the setup. It’s a story of survival, teamwork and growth amongst them.
The rage, the ignorance the horrific claims that clutter my virtual world sadden and disgust me as I see more protesters still uncertainly lurking at Town Hall.The conflation of anti-US sentiment with the purpose of the resolution thickens.
Yesterday, I quit my job. Which is to say, I gave notice, and will finish in two weeks. This means my days will soon be freed up to do all the things I most want to do—productive, creative, challenging things that are rewarding for me but not considered of equal monetary value as the screwing around I have been doing in my highly-paid job. Leaving that job is in every way unconventional, reduces my security, and makes my life thoroughly unpredictable. But for now, that hard left feels good.
“Women of today are still being called upon to stretch across the gap of male
So, I have to make up with my cat, and like any good man, the path to forgiveness is through his stomach. Can you say milk? And cheese? Yes, and even *gasp* tuna. Tuna always works.
“And Every Day when the Sun Cracks The Sky… He comes…”
It’s hard to see how this could be implemented – as Wilde admits, it would go beyond “the limits of existing politics” – but the real question I’d like to pose to those reading this post is how workable it would be. What do you see as the potential pitfalls and problems with this as a concept?
“An embarrassed silence ensued.”
Breivik was not alone on Utoya Island. He did not have the time or opportunity to plant the bombs in Oslo. The whole Breivik case stinks of Zionist orchestration, and is definitely a false flag designed to crush genuine dissent to the international order. We can now see why groups such as the EDL were formed: to bring those who oppose mass immigration into the spotlight, and then to use them to scapegoat genuine opponents of the international cabal. Don't be fooled by the likes of Breivik. Just like 9/11, 7/7, Pearl Harbour, the Madrid and Bali bombings, the Israeli attack on the USS Liberty, both World Wars, and many many other acts of pure evil, the Oslo atrocity was the work of the Elders of Zion. And yet again, those who oppose their tyranny, face persecution as scape-goats for crimes committed by the real enemy of all humanity.
You can see how this could be a terribly wicked game to play with pre-teen girls in the woods, locked away from boys and television diversions.
Chandigarh, April 4. She opened the book of love when she was still learning to figure out geometry theorems and understand Newton’s laws of motion. For the bubbly Harpreet Kaur, every action had an equal and opposite reaction when it came to affection. She was at that time studying in Sant Prem Singh Khalsa High School at Begowal with Kamaljit Singh’s younger brother Simarjit.
He redeems you from hell—saves your life!
A corrupt legal adviser from Hayes is facing a further three years in prison unless he hands over more than £245,000. Ravi Gupta, 41, of Carlyon Road, was jailed in August after admitting 14 charges of assisting illegal immigration and one of obtaining leave to remain by deception. As an accredited immigration law adviser, Gupta made thousands of pounds supplying clients with fake documents including certificates and pay slips that helped their immigration applications.(cont:)
Cover: It's beautiful. I love the soft, watercolor feel it has to it.
SHE WHO WHISPERS
Although not as good as the late career peak of Straight Outta Lynwood, Yankovic's still got that silly chart pop parody magic. And now that everyone samples and remakes everything with relative easy thanks to technology, the detailed note-for-note reproductions of his targets are less impressive than the way he's able to rewrite the lyrics syllable-for-syllable so that, say, Miley Cyrus is signing about murdering people for the CIA. Also, "Polka Face" is his best polka medley in well over a decade.
by: Dr. Isaac Eliaz
Ray seemed to champion the downtrodden and the misfits of society. Paul McCartney was keen to dedicate songs to his sheepdog in the meanwhile. Ray wrote about these elements because he could identify from them. He was a downtrodden misfit growing up, and in many respects he's been a downtrodden misfit within the music industry - and I say this as a high compliment. (See also: Zappa, Frank; The Residents; Beefheart, Captain.)
The Trainer Leash simply uses gentle but firm resistance to stop your dog from walking you. It attaches to any collar with its easy to fasten hook clip. It also features a gripped handle and just amount of slack to keep my dog close to my side.
I think when we watch and listen to the stories of others, we often become co-conspirators in their dreams. And, in turn, their dreams often fuel our own. In watching and listening to the stories of those around us, we invest ourselves, we make ourselves a part of, we plug-in. We encourage and cheer-lead.
I’ve forgotten his name! Hang on. Ah. There are going to be some name changes I think. I named him Evan Whittaker. And I gave him an antoganist almost as soon as he gets his car stopped, a trucker named Colin Creedmore (no, that’s not a ripoff of Wm Gibson’s character Buell Creedmore, no not at all, uh-uh). Who eventually becomes one of the cannibal rednecks. And probably lives to tell about it too, all the way to the Freedom Camp and beyond.
On the way home from ballet class Monday evening: I'm driving, Missy is alone in the backseat, Elton John is on the radio singing one of his whinier, sappy love songs.
Where do I start? My biggest anxiety is the human race losing the ability to see right from wrong,–the ability to pick up a rock and hurt someone. I look at all the injustice and the crime rates. We are citizens of this world whether we like it or not. We have a responsibility to take care of the earth and take care of the people on the earth. Why and how did humans get it in their heads that it is okay to kill people? These people that are being killed have mothers and family members. The thing that makes us human is kindness. I worry about all the kids in high school committing suicide because of bullying. Did their parents not teach them to be kind?
Warren said people in the building where the attack had taken place and who saw the attackers before and after the incident had also not been approached by police in a bid to gather any evidence.
A magnificent creature, which lion considers a delectable morsel for his lunch, stands nearby, unsuspecting. Leisurely nibbling on grass and sipping from the stream, satisfying its cravings. Neglectful to its surroundings, distracted from being vigilant.
H.R. 1981 is yet another similar piece of legislation. Under the guise of protecting children from pornography, it would require online service provides to, as Gottlieb points out, “spy on your online activities and provide that information to the government. H.R. 1981 “is all about data retention and requires Internet service providers to keep detailed records of your internet activity, your name, address, bank account numbers, and credit card numbers.”
Get what I’m saying? Just want to make sure
Probably my favorite though, was sitting across from them while we had lunch at one of those cute, albeit pretentious cafes that wants to know if you want your water sparkling or still. Lol, bubble or tap. Of course we had to go for the sparkle, because we didn’t want to clash with our water. Momma Marginalia want to know how to help get the word out. Which was fabulous people do, they ask how they can help. I also got to sit back and observe the genetic mirroring. It was more delicious than my lunch. I can appreciate how hard-won it was. Like talking to Ms. M. she already felt like a close friend .
She finally rested her mouth in the crease between their thumbs and index fingers. Allowed herself to be sucked in by the tide of memory that washed over her.
she hasn't had one is a very, very long time.
8 “And I tell you, every one who acknowledges me before men, the Son of man also will acknowledge before the angels of God; 9 but he who denies me before men will be denied before the angels of God. 10 And every one who speaks a word against the Son of man will be forgiven; but he who blasphemes against the Holy Spirit will not be forgiven. 11 And when they bring you before the synagogues and the rulers and the authorities, do not be anxious how or what you are to answer or what you are to say; 12 for the Holy Spirit will teach you in that very hour what you ought to say.”
sean was very gracious to me, but i still felt terrible.
Alister McGrath also refers to the 1966 event, albeit briefly, in his Evangelicalism & the Future ofChristianity.23 McGrath claims that it “was widely seen to centre on the issue of separatism”.24 Again, McGrath is another writer who partly misunderstands the call of Lloyd-Jones in his 1966 address; for McGrath, it was a “passionate call” for Evangelicals in mixed denominations to “form a denomination of their own”.25 McGrath is correct in viewing the National Evangelical Anglican Congress at Keele in April 1967 as having “endorsed and consolidated”26 Stott’s opposition to Lloyd-Jones. He continues: “It sealed this development and marks the beginning of the positive role of evangelicalism within the Church of England”. Keele was determinative and is “widely regarded as marking the end of a numerically significant ‘separatist’ party within Anglican evangelicalism…”.
The grass faded from lush green to beige. The garden became dull, their busy lives carefully moving around the edges without ever taking the time to stop and take a good look at what was happening.
We know the world has really changed when ‘revenue’ or ‘profit’ are the last on the list. But the truth is that revenue should really be the end result of getting the first 3 items on this list right. Which is why so many sales happen before this occurs. The suitor knows this, and is essentially trying to acquire the asset at a discount, prior to the realisation of its full value. That said, if you do have revenue then the minimum amount we should ever sell the business for is equal to annual revenue. But we all know that any digital asset could be sold for many times more.
Add the non dairy milk and vanilla and beat until combined. Sift in flour, tapioca, cream of tartar, bi-carb, and salt, beat until a dough forms.
Sharshar's reaction was a mixture of perplex and rage. But he recovered quickly and stood up and walked the few steps into the fray.
Gloomy Sunday – Billie Holliday
In February we had a set back (that became a huge step UP if you understand how He works in His amazing timing) and were told that our home study could not be approved until we both underwent full psychiatric testing due to our backgrounds and histories. Ok, we can handle that – no biggie right? Yeah, not so much. Knowing what was in our history made the process very nerve-wracking. Neither of us had any idea what to expect and although I had seen counselors off and on my whole life, I never put much faith in their answers or recommendations. This time was very different. As our wonderful Christian psychiatrist explained, the tests were designed to find problems. Everyone who has ever taken these tests, could arguably have something wrong with them. She showed us the results while trying to reassure us that it wasn’t to tear us down but to make us aware of things that we could improve upon to better ourselves and our marriage in the long run. Unfortunately, my husband and I both internalize criticism, no matter how constructive or how positively spun it is, and this knocked us both down a bit.
The Deal: "Rencuentro Milonguero" means the deal is proper close-embrace salon tango, in an unbroken and truly close embrace, i.e. plastered-around-his-neck-and-staying there 'close', to traditional music (what the Europeans call 'milonguero style'). That is the whole point and purpose of this gig, so if it's not what you do or what principally interests you, if you can't already do it with a fair level of comptence, or if you don't know and love the traditional music, it makes no sense at all to bother with this. You will be wasting your time, feeling out of place, looking like a fool, and stuck with unsuitable partners. Consider the Berlin Tango Festival instead, which is on at about the same time in that marvellous town and has many and varied tango-substances to offer which may suit you.
The biggest lie is the one told when the political scum oozes out of that repository of treachery and deceit beside Parliament Square and claim that the multi-racial experiment being imposed upon the descendants of those who died in the world wars, or in the case of the second war, upon those who survived it in their old age, somehow represents the spirit and principle for which they fought, it does not.
*Iron Stylus leaves the room to go post on the forums.*
-that a cold beverage is very welcome when one learns many things in a small amount of time
Owen: You have no idea! That night was one of the most difficult things I've ever done in my whole life. But, Charlotte is the most important thing in my life and seeing her happy is all I want, so I went along for her. I don't think anyone was expecting Cameron to show up and he's lucky that his Mom pulled him aside because I was just about to lose my cool with him. Especially after he called Charlotte his wife.
We check the neighborhood, the house. A neighbor even heard us calling and came out to double check her garage. That night on our bike ride I, each time I heard a dog, I’d call Molly’s name. Came home rode around the neighborhood, and still couldn’t find that stinkin’ dog!
Nova Scotia making strides. 25% RE by 2015. 40% 2020.
Where – Design Museum, SE1 2YD
I don’t know about anyone else, but the little comment that wordpress gives me after every single post I make is starting to drive me crazy.
Even though I’ve still got lots of US-related posts to get through, I wanted to take a break and write about something else, so here’s my review of Hanskin’s Super Snail BB Cream which I’ve been using for some time now.
Q: You wrote throughout Junior High and High School, but stopped writing for a long time after a teacher suggested you were better suited for other things. What happened to make you rediscover your love for writing?
+ Limited-slip differential fitted as standard
And oh you got so much going for you going right
"From there to here, and from here to there, funny things are everywhere!"
She is actually pregnant with a girl now. And she says she'll be enrolling her daughter in the same private school system. Um, that's 2x tuition at $17,000 a year. I would just DIE!
I learned through personal experience that college isn’t a good place to find yourself, and that there are much better places for that. Write a book. Save the rainforest. Teach English as a second language. Revitalize your community. Build a house. Live somewhere that you don’t speak the language. Read this blog.
The speeches by the three female Laureates provided the real raising-hairs-at-the-back-of-the-neck moments during this year’s Nobel festivities – from Ellen Johnson Sirleaf’s rallying call to women, past and present; to Leymah Gbowee’s unbreakable spirit in the face of rape and AK47s; to Tawakkol Karman’s missive from the revolutionary youth. The image burned deepest into my retinas is how Gbowee created the Women of Liberia Mass Action for Peace Campaign with six other women gathered in a makeshift office, armed with nothing but their conviction and $10. It’s an inspiring and profoundly humbling image.
Scrap a retro 80's LO. Vintage pics of you or if maybe you are not as old as me...... find some fun ones that will work for a 80's LO.
Cherries to garnish
The ratings for the regular series, since BB1, have been as follows:
- Two really cool acquisitions:
The EP concludes with “Fat Boy, Easy On My Whiskey,” featuring a demonic vocal styling and an ass-pummeling lead by Jon “Dr. J” Sullivan, formerly of Jack’s Mannequin fame, which pave the way for a progressive Industrial-Rock head banger.
Please check to be sure they are free for the Kindle before clicking to purchase. As of this morning (4/19) I noticed a few that were still listed at full price. - Jessica
Everyone loves deep fried crispy fritters especially when there are hot out from the wok. Prawns are the common ingredient use in non vegetarian version of this fritters. You can add any crunchy types of vegetable in the batter and it is the final texture of the fritters that will tell whether the fritters are good or not! This is also a good way to get kids to eat vegetable.
I used my powers to help myself and the team, but my powers were limited, but we were able to clear or almost clear several more underground levels; but eventually we had to retreat back to the first underground level after getting over-whelmed.
what you need to do vs what you or "I want"
On the last day we headed back to Downtown Disney, but this time to eat at T-Rex. It is like Rainforest Cafe, but with dinosaurs. And this time J loved it! There is a meteor shower that happens about every half hour and every time she would point at all the dinosaurs moving and stare with wonder. It was so much fun, and a great way to end our trip.
Finally, the latest with us. We were able to take a lot of drives this Fall and saw some awesome Fall leaves! It was so much fun to drive together and chat and enjoy the beautiful views. We did a hike and got dinner and just drove around to different places.
All I want is satisfaction!
This book just didn't do it for me, I'm sad to say. I think it does a good job in dealing with issues and questions that come up in the family dynamic. I liked that the point of view switches between each of Leah's family members instead of focusing on just the parents' viewpoint or just Leah's viewpoint. It showed how lack of communication and even miscommunication can create problems for a family. However, I like my fiction to have a balance. This book is just one depressing situation after another. Right after things start to seem a little better, another horrible thing happens. I will venture to say that most of our lives are filled with quite a bit of happy moments among the sad, frustrating moments, and I would have liked to see more of that.
Beatrice Straight – Dr. Lesh
not everything is to share...
A better way of creating schools-within-schools lies in the house system favoured by private schools like my own alma mater (turns out all that preamble was for a good reason). Students were allocated to a house at random, and were then further subdivided into “tutor groups” which ran across the year groups, which were used for pastoral care. That way, students feel like they’re part of small communities, but these communities are more reflective of society-at-large.
Social advantage – By the time I began seeing my business friends in Fort Worth at the Chamber of Commerce meeting this morning, I had a delightful disposition. (My disposition was NOT delightful at 4:00AM. Sorry to disappoint.)
Oldco would have Mr Miller’s purchase price, but as I have mentioned ad nauseam, I don’t see this as producing anything for unsecured creditors. Therefore there cannot be a successful CVA and therefore there is a winding up of oldco.
Hook
we'll just have to wait and see....
I have friends and even some family members who are atheists. I don’t mind that they have concluded there is no God. Many have. I do mind that atheist groups are forever trying through the courts to remove religion from our nation’s life. There would be no America if a bunch of pilgrims did not get on the Mayflower and come here for the express purpose of wanting to pray free of the intervention and persecution of the Crown.
“It’s the modern-day, and being Wonder Woman is complicated. Diana is leading a triple life – running a large corporation out of costume and fighting crime in costume in one identity, and living by herself in a small apartment with just her cat for company in another identity, in a desperate attempt to have some kind of normality”
How is the following 2008 US Human Rights report on Gabon different from the treatment of slaves by their owners in the 18th Century?
Mugabe described the ruling as “nonsense and of no consequence” to Zimbabwe.
I often marvel that the minute village of Chawton, Hampshire has become an homage to, not to mention resting place of, so much important women's writing. Just down the road from Jane Austen's House is Chawton House -- which contains a library of rare works published between 1600 and 1800. Although the Chawton House Library is well-known to academic scholars in the field, it is a best-kept secret that anyone may make an appointment to visit this unique collection. There is a monthly reading group, too, for anyone who cares to discuss Mary Wollstonecraft or other "foremothers" of English literature.
Finance Directors take their seat, and wonder who is sitting in front of them as their heads are in many different places.
I have absolutely no excuse for not blogging since Wednesday except for the fact that I have been 100% LAZY. That's it--no crises, no late nights (well, one), no working from home after hours--I've just been indulging in trash mysteries and my favorite magazines and early bedtimes instead of challenging myself to write something funny and/or irreverent and/or meaningful every day.
Shall we gradually seek to pare the import list even further by head-to-head contests and competitions?
The Critics’ Choice Television Awards will honor programs and performances that aired between June 1, 2011 and May 31, 2012 in the following categories:
The story ends with Mr. Shiftlet praying to the Lord to wipe all the scum from the earth. Meanwhile a turnip shaped cloud descends from above and passes over the setting sun. As it begins to rain, the drifter resumes his travels toward the town of Mobile.
I did go to the Earth Day protest with Kaori (my daughter) my wife a moms. It was nice, no tear gas or pepper spray.
“You have legacy costs that we can’t afford,” Petri said.
the bone
I misted all of the doilies used with Glimmer Mist in Pearl before adding them to my layout. The white edge effect was created by sanding the edges of the patterned paper with a sanding block purchased at a local home improvement store.
Sleep will be non-existent for a while. I am really worried about what happened to him.
All this fun on the beach was ours for free thanks to our handy California State Park vehicular day pass, as long as we were there between the hours of 6 am and 11 pm.
to do the same... until now
We swam the long winding lazy river. (So many times.)
In an earlier post I mentioned how my high school best friend and I touched bases with each other recently. Since then we've been corresponding through email and sharing bits about life and suggestions for good reads. This is one of Diane's suggestions.
It doesent matter how much im trying to prepear on sunday evenings, its always maniac monday over here,lol.
your soul song
“Yes, although when we spoke to Mr Levene, he said it was you with the drinking problem. That it's you who's not safe to be around the children. That you're drinking in excess of two bottles of vodka a day.”
EASTWEST – Westbury
sure, he was crazy, sick, mean-as-fuck sometimes, but somewhere in there was a soul. i really hope when he dies that they bury him in that old cemetery – the one he loved so much – and scrawl something really meaningful on whatever they use for a tombstone there,
At that moment, my access to the long-awaited awesome new server was permanently disabled. But hey, it was rockin' my world for a day!
A big THANK YOU to all the contributors to this week's carnival. And a big THANK YOU to you for attending. Please help promote the carnival on your own blog (you can use one of the spiffy COH images found here*), Facebook, Twitter, Google+, homeschool message boards, and your local homeschool email groups by sharing the link to the carnival!
Russia’s Volga River is the longest waterway in Europe. It winds its way south from northwest Russia to the Caspian Sea. Many tributaries pour into the Volga, causing its swiftly flowing blue-green waters to rush even faster. Through the centuries, the river has been a major transportation route. Even today, barges carry goods to and from factories along the shore.
Its mechanics whirs and purs
Then they all started using their boogie boards to ferry stones back and forth. This kept them amused for much longer than HB and I expected. In the photo below I caught the exact moment Kitcat's boogie board tipped over and she lost not only the rocks but also her snorkel/goggle set which had been fellow 'ferry' passengers. The girls then spent a bit more time trying to feel, with their feet, the lost goggles on the river bed. They were not successful and we had to leave without them. After the relentless torrential rain we've had here for the past week, I'd say that snorkel/goggle set are now being used by another child ..... probably in New Zealand!
19
So, if you're thinking of taking up knitting, or have done so for years and are looking for a place to connect to others in your craft, look no further! Unraveled is open Tuesday, 10:30 a.m. to 8:00 p.m.; Wednesday and Thursday, 10:30 a.m. to 6:00 p.m.; Friday, 10:30 a.m. to 5:00 p.m.; and Saturday, 10:30 a.m. to 3:00 p.m.
So today is my 9th anniversary! Lucky for me I know how to make cards, hehe! Or should I say lucky for my hubby! February is not only my anniversary month, but also Valentine's day and my birthday! We should all take a moment to feel sorry for my hubby hehe!
The 2 bedrooms were retained with some modifications. A Doorway was introduced between the 2 Bedrooms to allow direct access to the front kids’ room. The small window in the master bedroom fronting the air well is transformed into a large doorway to allow occupant to enjoy natural air and greenery from the bed day and night.
If you guessed “pretty horribly” to the above question, you’d be right on the money. The Lucky One is just a collection of schmaltzy moments, many of which are cringe-worthy, that sticks fairly closely to the Nicholas Sparks formula and that will probably appeal only to those who were already fans of it already (which, sadly, is many millions of people).
these deepest fears
"Purple Haze" Hendrix
Article 8. Where any copyright owner who, upon finding out the infringing information, warns the Internet service provider about this or requests for the network registration material of the infringer is unable to produce proofs of his identification, ownership of the copyright and the circumstance of the infringement, such warning or request shall be deemed not to have been made.
I am grateful that I am living in Malaysia. Compare to others, natural disasters here are puny.
I had many plans for Spring Break. I decided I was going to explore Spain instead of leaving the country. My plan was fly to Barcelona on a Thursday and spend four days with a Couch Surfer from San Diego, Calif. During my stay, Bilbao was playing Barcelona IN Barcelona and I was going to get tickets. I was then going to bus to Madrid, then to Seville, Granada, Cordoba and finish my travels Salamanca.
In the long run, Liberal Democrat eyes may turn to another candidate. For David Cameron was not the only personable former public school boy without embarrassing political baggage who signed on as a Guardian Unlimited columnist in spring 2001.
We were allowed to drive into the orphanage. They were expecting us. We were introduced to the staff. The Director and assistant directors. They even brought teachers over to introduce to us. We were given hot tea (wonderful on another cold day)to drink and asked to stay in the office.
…When I wrote this post–which, I’m sorry, should have earned me several Internets, I immediately pictured, like, one of those teenybopper magazines for girls with an impishly posed Hitler on the cover.
Slunk pouting out when the limp time came;
If you have a blog, congratulations! Get personal and describe what receiving the Night of Hope award means to you and your work. Also take the time to list and congratulate the other award winners.
Ohh and I almost forgot…American Citizens who happen to live in the vicinity of the Summit will have to provide “their paperz” if they want to access their homes during the summit.
His silence trapped the breath in my chest. His lips pulled down, dragging his eyebrows with them, but his eyes never left mine. His eyes. They knew, they understood the calling doesn’t go away, could never stop.
Welcome to my weekly post of sweetpea stamps. This week we are focusing on the images of Conie Fong. This one is called Buttercup and looks very much like a summerstamp, especially as it comes with a little butterfly hovering around the girl's head. I decided to cut the image out instead making it a Christmas one. Doesn't she look like she's waiting for Santa?
Thanks so much for playing along! Can't wait to see what you have made!
Let's share ideas!
chance to run against Newt Gingrich
Make sure you like my facebook page because I am planning on doing a jewelry giveaway soon!
Still no word from Dooks on the $$$ crisis.
It’s one of those times where you just can’t… Feel… Him quite as much as you’d like to. It’s unsettling; I’ll just be straight up about that.
I just got my package in this morning and I have to play with my new goodies. The Medallions background is too pretty and very easy to stamp. It really makes a eye catching BG. LOVE IT! What do you think?
I've tried this Australian gold - Sinfully Black tanning booster~ !
When I was newly married and wanted to learn to make pie dough I stumbled on a September 2007 issue of Cook’s Illustrated magazine and they told me how to do it. But…I don’t have a food processor. In my limited cooking experience at that time I would have just moved on if I did not own every cooking implement listed in the recipe.
The biggest difference between a trial and a temptation is where it’s coming from. A trial is generally an external event. It’s something that happens to us, and we probably have limited control over it. A temptation on the other hand is an internal event. It happens in us, and our level of spiritual maturity and self-control can impact the outcome.
Also, I wanted to walk you all through Reed’s end of bath time routine. All of this is every night. Gaines has long been out of the tub as Reed likes to stay in and play for about forever. Finally, he’ll decide to get out and will let the water drain but he stays in until all the water is drained. He lays on his stomach head toward the faucet and holds all the toys back from the drain like it’s his job. He yells at the toys, “Nobody wants to get lost!” Once all the water is gone and the threat of losing a toy is gone, he stands up and stomps his feet in the tub as he yells, “FEE, FIE, FOE, FUM…I AM A GIANT. A SCARY, SCARY GIANT”. Then he gets out and runs in his room were one of us wraps him in a towel. Now he’s a bird in an egg. He stays that way until he’s warm enough and then he starts cracking. “Crack, crack, crack, crack” until his towel is all the way off. Then he runs around his room “tweeting” and flapping his wings until he is forced to put on pajamas.
There is also the constant complaining about benefit scroungers, egged on by the Daily Mail among others. TV shows which are reminiscent of old fashioned freak shows, such as the X Factor and BGT, especially in the early rounds. The intolerance of the sick and the disabled of your "government" highlighted by regular extreme and rare examples of benefit fraud in the tabloid press.
I decided to make the piece without a border and with white binding to draw more attention to the old photographs.
The PB version below...certainly the most accessible, is $349/chair. Um...ouch. I don't know if I'll be able to do much better going the vintage route but I have to try. I don't even need them all to match! I just need the same general shape and of course height.
That’s why meditation is necessary to ponder what we need from our own future.
Your every sin and blunder just proves that I am right
Good girls don’t get raped.
This book has been hugely popular since its introduction into the collection last year. Jamie Carpenter’s story has huge appeal for teenage boys, no doubt helped by the inclusion of Frankenstein. (Read my review of Department 19 here).The interest in this franchise will only increase with the release of the next instalment The Rising.
This is quite incredible - she got more votes than everyone else put together and then some!
Darling Girl Glitter Glue (applied all around the eyes, blending in gently with ring finger)
Fourth week, again, I can't really see any difference in the scale. So then, what is the point? But I had made something to eat that had broccoli in it, and I had overcooked the broccoli, and I really hate overcooked broccoli. But, I made it, so I should eat it. And there was ice on the roads and all of that. It just wasn't a good time to waste food.
Hancocks extraordinary findings form the core of what could be an intellectual revolution, a dramatic and irreversible change in the way that we understand our own past and thus ourselves.
She said it was embarrassing for Australia as a Refugee Convention signatory that the Malaysia swap policy was forcing asylum seekers on a ”more desperate and longer” journey. ”It’s a blight on Australia. We are certainly not burden sharing.”
Acts 27:24
But today, Laura asked me a question that I can't answer, and the internet can't really help me on this one.
But France refused asylum to Vladimir Popov, Yekaterina Popova and their two children, who claimed that they were persecuted in Kazakhstan because they were Orthodox Christians and ethic Russians. French authorities kept them in detention for two weeks and repeatedly tried to deport them to Kazakhstan. That seems to be in line with the treatment of asylum seekers in Australia and, in some cases, South Africa.
Such a thing, he says. Eastman wants to belong to both cultures at once. Among the elements that make his books so intriguing is how well or how poorly he succeeds one moment to the next.
Before I began working full-time, I stayed home with my kids, and had oodles and oodles of time to spare. But I hardly got any writing done.
That aside, we’ve had a nice day. She has decided to take a Playmobile giraffe, elephant and teeny tiny mouse to bed with her – as well as Bunny – so it may be fun in the early hours if one gets “lost”.
reality is dependent on the current valid premisses & definitions defined by the participants in the reality
I have always considered the perpetual student as someone who constantly strives to learn more about themselves and the world around them. They are a student of wisdom, understanding, intelligence and prudence all of which relate to one’s ultimate knowledge.
Instead of taking a firm stand against Islamist fanaticism, we've made a cult of negotiations -- as our enemies pursue nuclear weapons; sponsor terrorism; torture, imprison, rape and murder their own citizens -- and laugh at us.
Coming out from Las Vegas at a very slow pace. It was a long night. Shafi had to get up at like 3AM or something to catch his flight. Then these guys slept till almost check out time. Good thing it was possible to check out using a machine, otherwise the checkout line at the lobby was as long as the line to mausoleum.
Sophomore year broke Clementine Williams’ heart. She fell for her best friend’s boyfriend and long story short: he’s excused, but Clem is vilified and she heads into summer with zero social life. Enter her parents’ plan to spend the summer on their sailboat. Normally the idea of being stuck on a tiny boat with her parents and little sister would make Clem break out in hives, but floating away sounds pretty good right now. Then she meets James at one of their first stops along the river. He and his dad are sailing for the summer and he’s just the distraction Clem needs. Can he break down Clem’s walls and heal her broken heart? Told in alternating chapters that chronicle the year that broke Clem’s heart and the summer
Lifting his head Ben rubbed his face and looked over at Donna, her eyes red rimmed even in sleep. Face pale and hollow that anger flickered again shining a little stronger through suffocating grief. Her own the only thing to match it. Throwing an arm over her he buried face against sleep-warmed shoulder, pressed his lips and for a moment almost forgot to feel the aching sorrow. But just as he was narrowing the world down to nothing more than that soft warm shoulder and the sweet tickle of fine shampoo-scented hair catching on his cheek so in need of shaving, she whimpered in her sleep.
Lord I repent on behalf of the church. I repent for ignorance on how to approach sexual immorality. I repent for being hateful to Your precious creation, your sons and daughters. I repent for not protecting the sanctity of life and not taking a stand against the abomination of abortion. I repent for our pride in our own works and pride in our flesh and our rules. I repent for not reaching out to the lost in love, but most of all I repent for not seeking your face.
Mom thinks: Is it possible?
road grader
I found that people were so receptive to a friendly face, even from a passing stranger, and every time it started a short dialogue. It made me happier to see I made them smile so I can only imagine that it made them happy too! And everyone loves ‘happy’ in small unexpected doses!
What would the game be like if one of the other players was the GM? There's a danger of learning more than you wanted about how your settings, plots and NPCs are viewed, but seeing your world from the other side of the screen is bound to teach you something. Decide in advance, or in retrospect, if it's canon or not.
Please excuse the note pinned on the lower left. I still have notes on some embroidery to add and buttons to add when it's finished. Forgot to take the note off for the picture.
For all of the bleeding hearts who keep insisting how much we need illegal aliens in America and they do the work that American won’t do, a special news report from Indiana’s WTHR 13 News might not sit well with you.
Robert C. Sibley: $24.95 paperback
Make lemon syrup: In a small saucepan, bring 1/4 cup sugar, lemon juice, and 1/4 cup water to a boil over medium heat, stirring to dissolve sugar. Let cool completely, then brush over both sides of cake slices. Quarter each slice.
A couple of weeks ago I was looking at the Carousel Lounge website and noticed that local 90s alternative rock heroes The Wannabes were playing at the club but apparently had no opening band. A quick call to Nikki, the club's manager, put an end to that vacancy. The Dentones would open for the Wannabes starting at 7:00.
re-inventing animism.
I am only making an observation. But I think further study could be interesting.
Her life.
She loved him. He lusted her. That was the pain of her life.
I'm bone tired. The professor is at a conference receiving an award and I'm here playing zone defense. I prefer man-to-man coverage. There's been more zone than I like lately...but I work on choosing the gratitude and finding the joy. I listen to Ann's voice fill up the quiet of the car and pump loud over the thumping of the washing machine. The girls rush down from the dance room to see if we have a visitor who speaks over helicopters. I laugh, thinking that Ann Voskamp probably never raises her voice to that level. She finds the gifts. Tonight, I'm seeing only crumpled up wrapping paper.
This week was busy wasn’t in the office much! Monday, I helped out with the student union registration day – it was quite boring and i realy wasn’t really needed but ya know what students are like – if its too much work they want nothing to do with it!!! LOL. Tuesday – was got a bitta SEO work done – but then was doing research for most of the day for our new business plan. Wednessday had Marketing training provided by the Letterkenny Chamber of Commerce – it was pretty good and then finished the presuasion seminar from last week, which was absolutely brilliant as i picked up loads and it will be extremely useful for when i have to do an e-mail marketing campaign.
+1 for tweeting/blogging (please leave a link!
"Russia’s Federal Service for Intellectual Property, Patents and Trademarks (Rospatent) has recently appealed against Moscow Commercial Court’s decision stating that Rospatent’s refusal to register the “Volodya i Medvedi” (Volodya and the bears) trade mark is illegal.
Congratulations on being featured on our blog! Be sure to grab the button from our sidebar and proudly display it on your blog! Also, be sure to stop back tomorrow for another fun challenge :)
Suddenly the Senator came to a halt in the middle of the skyway, his feet nearly skidding on the carpet. Ken placed his back against the Senator and kept his focus on the opposite entrance, his double-bladed lightsaber gripped firmly in his right hand. He placed his left on the small of the Senator’s back and gave a gentle push.
Recently I was reading Job again and there’s so much that I missed before.
Later! =D
I’m gonna beat this horse till it’s dead about the friendship thing, b/c this especially applies in cases where a man is befriending a woman thinking this is the easiest and best Segway to gain romantic interest.
Gavroche shuddered as the raw scotch seared her throat. She had killed a man. Taken a life. And a part of her was glad. She didn’t know if that was good or bad but it wasn’t going to go away.
Frederick A. Klingenstein
April 14 - Trevor Bannister, actor (Mr. Lucas on "Are You Being Served?"), 76
So humble yourselves under the mighty hand of God,
April: (mocking) "Okay, mom. Okay, mom. Fuck you, how about that?"
Sunday morning
This is the moment that you know
And then there’s the Howells’ son Thirsty, who wants his father out of the way so that he can take over the Howell oil business. He hopes Ginger can talk some sense into his father, but then Uncle Franz comes up with a better plan: maroon the elder Howell on Santou Island.
All the papers from about the last five years that we have been lugging around from house to house. In 2009 we did a massive purge of papers when we put our house on the market. That purge took an entire day and gave us fourteen banker boxes of papers to be shredded, because between the Mister and I, we are packrats who save every scrap of paper that we have ever touched. We attempted to shred it ourselves but after an hour we burned out the motor on our shredder, and we ended up calling in a professional document disposal company. Since that purge I have tried to be less Hoarder-y and only keep what we need.
You can find for example a blogger who ordered on the 5th October 2005 and paid for a 24 hour delivery but not yet received anything on the 18th October. A Jim will Fix it had promised to arrange it but oe week later, on the 25th October, the customer had still not received an update from Pixmania. On the 8th November, 34 days after the customer placed his order with Pixmania, his product still was not been shipped! According to their website the product that he purchased was currently in stock.
There will be an action packed evening celebration here in Stoke-on-Trent as part of the official London 2012 Torch Relay on Weds 30 May 2012. The following morning on Thurs 31 May the Torch leaves the Potteries Museum & Art Gallery at 7am to go onto its next destination.
The programme website is below which includes some clips so you can see what it’s all about.
In college, I rather quickly realized that life as a vet wouldn't be for me (thank you, Calculus 101, for so unapologetically pointing that out!) and then spent several semesters trying out a variety of academic majors. Ironically, I eventually landed in the humanities and found myself considering an English major. But Mr. Shakespeare's potential to tank my GPA still terrified me, so I avoided him by choosing a general "Humanistic Studies" degree instead of the more specific English major just so I could skip his eponymous class.
Rob mentioned how, when donating blood not so long ago, the woman had told him he had an unusually slow heart beat, just 40 bpm, and that he was not allowed to donate.
practitioner that provides some chilling data:
1) Fill a jar with love notes to your sweetheart.
Too late, he realized his mistake.
when I was young you spoke to me,
Gunter is concerned that even a minor earthquake or a subsidence in the earth under unit 4 could cause its collapse.
held in my own glove covered hands
Claro M. Recto, Ramon Diokno, Jose O. Vera, Alejo Mabanag, Jose B. Laurel, Jr. and Antonio Barredo for petitioner.
Early on I talked about my 15-pound Chiweenie, Bugsy. Now I get to introduce you to his older, aggressive, pint-sized sister, Violet. We got her from a no-kill shelter almost two years ago, and we were told she was between three and five years old. She had very little records and almost no history. We joke and say she's from the streets, which is why she's ten pounds of pure aggression.
(from here all of you look like you could do with another version of reality to test your dream against)
There was once a mind which bore the markers of a man in love. The mind waned as the love returned waned and now the mind wanders while the man wanders.
Green Party
Although it still seems like yesterday.
mandy heard the silent click of the extension. of course now her mother knew too. she crossed to the bathroom and got a small glass of water from the tap. as hard as she tried, she couldn't get the drip to stop. she sat the glass on the tile as she tried, twisting, grimacing....that damn thing just wouldn't stop. her hands shaking, she picked up the glass and looked into the mirror. as she did, a tear fell silently down her cheek and dripped into the glass forming concentric circles, much like the pirouettes she practiced today.
Seth L. Schein — Professor of Comparative Literature
In the first test you can notice how by changing the ISO values and keeping unchanged times and apertures the lighting in the framed scene increases, in the second test i try to make you understand what causes the increasing of the ISO, that is a the arrival of the electrical noise and the lowering of detail, the pictures in the second test were taken with the compact Canon G12.
After the meeting, McChrystal abruptly left and did not go in to attend the full staff war meeting.
Now it emerges that similar fears were expressed about his father, who was categorised with others as ‘anti-American and anti-white’ when he moved to the United States in 1959.
I have been working on my Bee blocks so I can get them out the door and start working on something for myself. So far I only have one more block to do, but I think more may be on their way soon.
Here's something cool:
They shall not grow old, as we that are left grow old;
Me balls! He stood up, splashed across the room and knocked the telly into the water. It was up to his knees now.
DAMIEN HIRST: In 2008, $270.7 million worth of his art sold at auction. In 2009: $18.3 million.
- 7 mills are sold.
Here’s Lookin’ at You, Kid…
On graduation day Tina and I spotted each other across a crowd of tassled caps, as my class moved up the steps of the Rotunda, and onto the Lawn to join the rest of the poor, working bastards out in the world. She gave me a friendly wave and disappeared.
This is the virtual version of the can can I guess. Some pretty fancy dancers dress up and try to get as much money from the patrons as possible. I am sick to death of being near suckered by these money grabbing, low down leeches.
And the kids told him
WEATHER and PHENOMENON are important elements in any setting, providing sensory texture and contributing to the mood the writer wishes to create in a scene. With a deft touch, weather can enhance the character's emotional response to a specific location, it can add conflict, and it can also (lightly) foreshadow coming events.
To be unwed and pregnant the way times were back then.
Who in the world has ever wanted to drive a hearse?
As a result I have started looking into upgrading machines and using this one as my back-up. I am expecting a little extra money to come within the next couple of weeks so now is definitely the time to do this. The only problem is I am not sure which machine I want to go with. I have always had Kenmore machines, which were produced by Janome for the Sears brand. I know that before I mentioned how awesome I think the 160th Anniversary Singer is, but I just cannot bring myself to purchase a Singer brand. Ever since Singer went bankrupt and was bought by another company I have heard quite a few bad things about their quality. Also, for the things I am sewing for my job, Singers just do not cut it.
Anyway, 90% of the time, as soon as I get the "I" out of my mouth most people start to argue with me because everyone thinks I'm extrovert. False. One of the descriptions of an INFJ that I read said that INFJ's are often mistaken for extroverts because we're caring- but that doesn't mean we're necessarily outgoing. So now to the point of this post. Some common misconceptions about introverts:
The cherries sink into the cake mix, producing a delicious gooey topping & the cake itself is quite dense & rich. It goes really well with a cup of tea, but it would work equally as well as a dessert served warm with either a good lashing of custard or a scoop of vanilla ice-cream! Hope you enjoy, have a good week & don't forget to enter the giveaway, Rebecca x
was it trickery?
I’m going to enjoy seeing them try.
I have used carriers with both of my children from a young age and enjoyed it, but I also make sure I do my research because any product, service or device when used incorrectly can cause problems and no parent wants that for their precious infant. I strongly advise practice with any baby gear to ensure accidents do not happen. With that in mind, I have some tips to help you to enjoy this special time with your little one:
there, but when you're in it
all dreams are for real?
She laughed like I was kidding and I said, “Damn it I hate when I go to the opt-out link and it just spools. Mom, are you spooling with me right now? Not cool Mom, not cool at all!”
that every night you're wishing an even further star,
Felt (yellow)
One reason I have become more comfortable with admitting this struggle lately is that I have come to see it as a grace in my life. In the midst of my doubt, I actually find myself being drawn closer to God and exercising faith in the midst of doubt. The paradox is that doubt seems to somehow strengthen my faith. As many have said, when God seems most absent from us He is often doing His most important work in us.
Their goal: Seal a deficit-reduction package of spending cuts and perhaps tax increases that will allow a vote by the Aug. 2 deadline to raise the U.S. debt ceiling beyond $14.3 trillion and avoid economic calamity.
ISBN-10: 091672770X ISBN-13: 978-0916727703
The most beautiful books in my life are the ones which keep on returning to memory at many and varied moments. Often inopportune ones, quite often at serendipitious ones, as if things I'd learned and half understood in the past suddenly fall into place for a wonderful "AHA" moment, in which many things which I'd been struggling with became clear. One of those books is "Zen and the Art of Motorcycle Maintenance" by Robert Pirsig, for me a deep and incisive enquiry into values, the meaning of quality and how ethics often seem to be at odds with daily realities.
Other ornaments include the little pinkish shiny ball ornament with Paul’s name written in glitter—I think he made it when he was about six , and the little red velvet bows, bought at Michael’s after Christmas one year for a dollar. They bring a unifying theme to the tree. I say this, smiling, because our tree is, and has always been throughout the years, a hodge-podge of our life. And I like it that way. I don’t think I could ever have a ‘theme’ tree. Mine is a ‘memory’ tree.
The simple fact that 5 million people are currently on the housing register for council property in the UK is testament to the lack of homes built in the previous period.
Disclaimer: Reading the bio of Jobs and also being the recent purchaser of a wonderful, sturdy, fast and sleek Macbook Pro, I have the inklings of having become an Apple cultist. Some of the feelings are not entirely dissimilar to my spiritual practice, for both give one the sense of a particular worldview. That is why, as I was walking through New York City recently, meditating on my prayer beads, I was struck by the idea that the mantra I was chanting was also like an app and how it was the best app I had in my life.
To monitor the situation in Europe in order to try and determine just how serious things are going to get there and by extension in the U.S., I would suggest watching 10-year sovereign bond yields and the price of Credit Default Swaps or CDS.
#1: The Voice of Reason (VOR) told me to use good quality honey. I admit the honey I used was somewhat cheapo. So buy good quality honey - it will make a difference.
The defeat didn’t take away from a tremendous season for Kingsway, which captured the Tri-County Conference Royal Division title.
At the pagoda we were offered tours as per usual and was a bit sick of saying no, so i tried saying no i didnt speak english in french, so he talked to me in french haha what a hero, we then climbed the mountain up the steep rock faces in our flip flops, which are not the best technical shoe you can buy, and had an awesome view from the top over more rice paddies and surrounding mountains. We then went for lunch and were joined by a lonely looking south African girl who explained the struggle for White people to get work in SA with positive discrimination as she described it.
the day. The kids love that I've been going to the gym. Every
Didsbury Arts Festival kicked off on Saturday. Yesterday morning I was moved to tears by the sight of these little boys playing with the Third Davyhulme Scout and Guide Marching Band outside the library. The little drummer was amazing - he did a solo, and the whole forecourt went wild.
It is important that we reconcile radical feminist theory with the idea that women can and do oppress other women. Radical feminism understands women’s oppression as intrinsically tied to male violence and the female-specific harms of rape and piv. Given this, in what sense can a woman be said to oppress another woman? To oppress, one must have power. But any power a woman has under the patriarchy is borrowed from white males, and they can take it away at any time. To retain power over other women, a woman must remain complicit with white male supremacy, and therefore with her own oppression. It is clear that advantaged women simply do not experience power in the straightforward sense that men do. But that does not mean that advantaged women are incapable of wielding the limited, conditional power we do have access to over other women.
In the darkness where sight no longer existed and sound was muffled and strange, my other senses went into overdrive. I could still taste my last cigarette on my teeth and tongue until, as my lips met his, the dusky sweetness of his breath took over. His aftershave and sweat were mixed with the increasing odour of our own bodily juices in a cocktail of scents that wafted over me like a sea mist. And every time his skin moved against mine it was like an electric shock that left behind an impression of form and shape. Meanwhile without any visual input to go on, my mind was inventing drifting colours and shapes which never quite became anything tangible.
Or is there? As it happens, neither live music clubs nor independent record stores have disappeared from the planet, though they do all have websites now. Nearly fifty years ago, an inveterate weirdo named Frank Zappa suggested that the “mainstream comes to you, but you have to go to the underground.” So I have returned to Austin to test this perfectly reasonable definition of ‘underground’ (I also want a decent plate of nachos.) I have found a flea market for locally-made electronic instruments like the Autonomous Bassline Generator, and a fourteen piece, orchestral pop group called Mother Falcon, playing at a club called Mohawk.
When simple might be more complex
I followed the “assimilating a lot of knowledge” option myself because I have always been as poor as a church mouse. This entire book is a collection of the experiences through which I collected knowledge. Reading this book will give you some idea of which experiences you may not want to have.
And in other news... I was supposed to be off to the UK this week, to attend a much looked forward to children's writers' conference in Winchester with all my SCBWI-BI pals. Unfortunately ongoing health problems have put paid to that. And am I miffed? You bet! Oh well, there's always next year and now I have no excuse to finish off the final tweaks and tucks to my manuscript.
Today is Sunday. It was 17 degrees outside (and it's still "Autumn," folks). Friday night's snow has turned to slush, and then frozen to ice. It's bite-your-face-off weather. It's SUNDAY. It's a good day stay inside. To curl up under a blanket and find a good movie on the telly, and wait until Monday. If they didn't have a valid excuse, "not feeling like going out" was good enough, today. Man, you have an automatic "Get Out of Jail Free" card. It was wretched.
If you can fund this (future) World Championship Team, please contact Don Pentecost @ 480-686-2125. I reside in the Scottsdale, Arizona (USA) area. I do not need to talk to any “posers” or wanna be investors, etc…You can also email me @ visionn2action@yahoo.com , and make sure that you put ” motorsport investor” in the subject line, or it will be instantly deleted.
We got Austen
The problem: How to overcome the republican ideal of universals with secular particularity?
I'm finally making the leap to do both.
So if you put GDT after your name when you enter this challenge, and you are lucky enough to get chosen you will be asked to design two cards which will feature on the Midway posts for the next two challenges. Full details will be sent to the lucky person on the day the next challenge goes live - so remember to watch your inbox!!
That wraps up the good commons and uncommons for Avacyn Restored. Of course there are a lot of other great green cards in the Avacyn set, but I don’t think their true potential will be unlocked until they are mixed in with cards in the the standard metagame. The next post will be the last “Tips” article, and will be featuring the White and Gold cards, which I think are the strongest in Avacyn. Be sure to check it out! Thanks for reading.
Sweetie, this is Grandpa. You need to call us on the cell right away. We need to talk to you. We love you, Moms Eye. Bye.
10. The Phantom Tollbooth - Juster (1961)
Saturday March 31, 2012 at 8:30 pm (local time),
And dusty streets
Assistance in the selection and engagement of appropriate “outside” counsel; and
Anyway, look at all that stuff! Some of that I will definitely use but some of it I would like to giveaway. Would you be o.k. with that?
Total units on day six are : 16.28
Ah! but those tears are pearl which thy love sheds,
- E Class Mercedes
Members of the People’s Assembly shall not be questioned in a civil or criminal manner because of events or opinions they express or during a vote in public or private meetings and during the work of the committees.
Several years ago based on EU policies it invested in eco friendly systems and developed a business plan to match. It employees around 800 people and was working 7 days a week. Jobs, as I say in a part of London that is desperately in need of such work. However, as I say the EU doesn't care about British jobs and has introduced a ban on Tate and Lyle importing sugar cane from Brazil, South Africa or Thailand ( thus providing work to poor people in those countries) unless Tate and Lyle pay very high tariffs. ( I ask you, where's the free trade here?)
#5 Germany is increasingly taking a hard line with Greece, and the Greeks are feeling very pushed around by the Germans at this point. Ambrose Evans-Pritchard made this point very eloquently in a recent article for the Telegraph….
There's the Montreal Rad School, a freeschool being started up by some really great people, who want to make freedom based education available to all, not just those able to unschool. This is a bilingual project.
The Cinnamon tea cakes recipe can be found over at Technicolor Kitchen. This site is great because the author is nice enough to include crazy American measurements on the English version of her Blog. I love not having to convert things from metric, because, like Barbie says, "Math is Hard." No, really it's because I'm lazy. Really lazy.
1. As an accent. Black belts, shoes, hats, and scarves are all great ways to add a little punch to an outfit that might otherwise look washed out. It helps if at least one item in your outfit has a little bit of black in it, such as thin stripes or outlines around a pattern.
Never let another’s ego
Told me how life had been…
Pop quiz: In the photos below, can you tell Oscar and Owen apart?
When government agencies that are supposed to serve the public aren’t safe spaces for transgender people, then routine citizen activities—like getting a license—become an albatross rather than an accomplishment. Registering to drive and vote are supposed to be proud moments, but for too many transgender people, it’s something to suffer through. And then consider that some government agencies require “proof” that you actually are the gender that you say you are—in some places that means getting gender reassignment surgery, whether it’s desired or not.
Natasha Middleton will choreograph this year’s production, which will feature award-winning dancers, dazzling magical illusions, special effects and aerialists performing fetes of daring. For further information, please call Media City Ballet at818-972-9692 or visit the website, www.mediacityballet.org
If you want to challenge your drawing skills go to a life drawing class or group. I am humbled every time. On rare occasion I haul my paints along which I did this last time and this was what I got after about an hour.
Even if you’re not a Timothy Olyphant fan (I think you’re a little nuts if you’re not), you need to be watching Justified. The show does everything right. The characters are believable, relatable, and real — a huge range of characters from all walks of life, but as a viewer, you buy into them.
I leave you hoping this card will like you at least how I liked it and anyway I hope I have been an inspiration for you.
They want it. It’s a God-given right. And it is our responsibility to help share the gift of freedom with people throughout the world that are seeking it.
I want to share the birthday card I made for my oldest son. He turned 27 at the end of October, omg! He loves music and rocks a spanish guitar big time. He is self-taught and I am soo proud of him!
Boil without stirring for approx 5 minutes until candy thermometer reads 250°. If you don't have a candy thermometer, 5 minutes is just about the right amount of time, don't worry too much.
Next morning, strain the custard through a sieve and add the rum (about 6 tablespoons*) to the ice cream base while reserving the raisins to be added later at the end of the churning process.
The plot of this was one I really enjoyed, because it was fully developed and always kept me guessing at who it was who broke into Maddie's profile and what their motive was all the way to the end. A good sign, no? Also, I liked the incorporation of technology with the add in of the Top 8 profiles, and how through Maddie's hacked profile it gave you a much needed warning message about technology.
He encourages her self-loathing. He undermines her confidence: “Husband? Love? How can one love alone?” then compliments her with the words of a man who’s sincerely paying attention. He gives her gifts. But he is most insidious when he compliments Dr. Robert. “Your husband does not think of you—he climbs the mountains,” Von Steuben tells Margaret one night, the two of them alone in her room. Were Dr. Robert out skiing, this would be an insult; but the doctor is tending to stranded climbers. He’s out saving lives.
½ cup unsalted butter, melted
Some people using it have been able to literally quadruple their income with it..
Cynthia Gaub I work best with deadlines and challenges. In many ways I am a very linear, organized, list-making type of artist. But usually if I just go up to my studio and sit down at my sewing center or collage desk I can start creating pretty quickly, getting TO the studio takes some inspiration. I will search the net, look at art books and doodle ideas in order to get myself into the head space for studio time.
"What is this?" Sam whispered to Abby, shuffling closer to her.
I will be entering this card into some challenges:
However, if I was going to go to Peru I have to say I'd rather go here:
After some tears and fears ("The airline won't refund, the campsite has surely given our trailer away, and every hotel on every beach within five hundred miles has got to be sold out!"), we convinced the nice butch lady at AlItalia to help us. She got us on a flight the next day.
this is the xbox 720. it is the microsoft gaming console the dosn’t even have a release date yet. the rumors are that microsoft will add new controllers such as a touch pad and one with more controls. they may also come out with new game series that are only compatible with the 720 and not the 360. and the 360 games will probably work on the 720. also the live accounts will work on both and the cloud saving probably will too.
Smokers are not the ones unwilling to compromise. Smokers are not the selfish ones. If non-smokers have rights - and they have been recognised for 40 years - then so do smokers. A bit like you can't have rights for people of one race and not have rights for people from another. You can't tell one social group that they can have everything and you can't tell another that they cannot.
Unfortunately, trying to teach yourself how to do a back handspring at the age of 10 is quite difficult when you do not have someone there to properly spot you and teach you the progressions. So, I never was able to perform one.
I am not those people. And I am in the slow process of ceasing to care.
Crash (;_;)
And then there are some tips on various forms of footwear for the chase “High Heels are ideal for all types of dancing except ballet (they obviously haven’t seen FLM attempt ballet) An added advantage: They make your backside look perky, so you know you look good coming AND going”
Trying to make brunch plans for Mother's Day? McCoy's will be having a special Mother's Day brunch buffet, staring at 10 a.m. on Sunday, May 13. For $19.99 per person, you can treat your ma to great start to her day!
Owner Julie Murray said: “I was amazed. Liliana wasn’t even pregnant. I’ve been breeding dogs 30 years and never seen anything like it.”
And then the other non writing boy asked for a journal. We found him another less masculine journal. I don't know if he has written in it or not but I am very glad his interest has been sparked. The frog may need to be simmered on low heat for a while.
Readers of this blog may disagree.
The Lyrics
Look, I understand that you’re just following orders, nameless army grunt, but do you honestly think that your little assault rifle is contributing to the situation in a positive way? Let me put it this way: I’ve been cowering behind this old Chevy for almost a full two minutes now, and I’ve watched you pump off, I don’t know, like a hundred rounds of ammunition into the giant, angry green monster over there, and do you know what you’ve achieved? Nothing. I ask you, how is the 101st bullet going to be any different?
If you're a writer, maybe you haven't considered putting ogres or trolls in your next book, but think about it. After all, we're almost done with the angel phase, so what's next? These characters can be great monsters and bullies, but they can also play the part of Beast to a Beauty—and who knows what else? (Artwork by Theodor Kittelsen, right.)
Given that you all have way more experience shopping for fabric online than I do, if you'd like to recommend resources you've used, please share them below, especially for those shopping overseas.
So the next time you want to put Cleveland on a list for not being awesome, maybe you should actually send a reporter here and see how the people in Cleveland get along. Maybe actually doing research would be better than reading wikipedia and throwing out some facts about Cleveland that were relevant 30+ years ago.
"There are lots of racists and bigots around and they are not all home educated; a lot of them went to school," says Arai.
- Denmark: traditional risalamande with cherry compote & almond tuille cookie with Mikkeller Ris a la M'ale - 8% ABV
I still love writing fantasy and sci-fi, but is it my passion? Firmly, I can say NO. It is not my passion. Many times I caught myself saying to myself, "You should work on this fantasy novel over this contemp novel because it has a better chance of selling," even though my muse was quite clearly in favor of the contemp novel. That made me feel dirty and wrong. That isn't the right reason to work on one project over the other.
In other (and perhaps related) news, my co-worker Bill has a theory that I am "into bald guys." For two years now, I have sat nearest Bill and shared my thoughts with him throughout the day. The poor guy gets my dumb commentary on life for 9 hours, 5 days a week. As a result, he has developed a well-documented theory that I am "into bald guys."
These companies are taking over fertile agricultural land and sacred sites and uprooting whole villages. They are displacing thousands of indigenous people – robbing them of their homes, destroying their livelihoods and culture, and reducing them to refugees in their own country. With little concern for India’s environmental laws, many of these companies are also destroying the land itself, not only for now but for generations to come, as they rip off the topsoil and pollute rivers and streams for miles with toxic effluents and poisonous mud.
I want to wish you and your families a very Happy, Healthy and Safe Holiday and a Happy & Prosperous New Year!
* ... And (I had to mention it) Spain winning the World Cup!! I'm still smiling! This couldn't have happened at a better time for Spain, we really needed a reason to celebrate. I celebrated in Oxford with my Spanish friends but here's an account from a Brit in Madrid.
We had a wonderful time seeing all your Fantastic Felties cards last week - what fab inspiration you shared with us, thank you.
I am shown around this old dormitory building by my colleague. He points out old features which, though no longer used, still remain. Between our recruitment presentations I look out the windows of a second floor corridor. There is a kindergarten next door. I can see the children playing in the yard. The emperors also attended there. The kids are being taken through their exercises. They jump and squat and stretch and march. They are bursting with energy. By the partition is a cherry blossom tree in full bloom. Cherry blossoms inspire awe in Japan. What astonishes me is just how astonished the Japanese are by these sakura. They watch them appear as though they had never seen them before, and gasp in wonder as if they had not expected this to happen. Apparently it is their transience which makes them sublime. They bloom. They explode into life; pink and white. They are beautiful. The nation rejoices. Then, almost as quickly, the wind strips the trees of them. They float down and land on the ground and in the rivers, and soon they are gone. They are fleeting. Therein lies their beauty.
Facepalm.
~ Hafiz
“Violating the wife of the captain of the guard who’s also in charge of this jail” said Joseph. “But I’m as innocent of that as you two are of trying to poison the Pharaoh.”
Place diced potatoes on a cookie sheet (sprinkle with olive oil and this seasoning salt - or one of your choice - for added flavor). Roast at 425 degrees until lightly toasted - about 40 to 45 minutes. At the same time you are roasting your potatoes you can cook your bacon! Place bacon strips on a greased cooling rack, then place the cooling rack with the bacon in a cookie sheet. I find this is the best way to cook bacon. The grease drains off of the bacon down into the cookie sheet for less fat! And the bacon is unreal it's so good! Be careful not over cook your bacon - it will cook a lot faster than the potatoes.
Turmeric - 1/4 tsp
Total 6 ingredients to make the cookies. How easy is that?
Zombies! And good, old-fashioned zombies: dead, slow moving, moaning, hungry, stoppable only in the traditional ways. And, most importantly -- the zombies are horrible, scary, terrifying, ever-present. All you who read and loved World War Z: An Oral History of the Zombie War don't have to know anything else; you will love this book. Trust me.
You picked up on details, and helped me find the answer I was looking for! Your insights are amazing, and very helpful. ~ Cindy K
Appearing on Fox News early Friday morning, Rivera conceded that George Zimmerman, the neighborhood watch captain who shot Martin, should be investigated, but he urged black and Latino parents to not allow their children to wear hooded sweatshirts.
When trying on the pants, you may wonder how the H are you going to wear them? You don't want to be constricted by wearing the same ensemble each time you venture out with them. Fortunately, colored denim is super versatile!
What the director didn’t know was that the manager guy had, all week, been playing-off the News of the World against The People to get a higher price for the sex scene pictures. The People ran their photos on the cover and in an “exclusive” double-page spread that Sunday.
In 1932 she joined the Association des Écrivains et Artistes Révolutionnaires, where she met André Breton and René Crevel. Following this, she started associating with the surrealist group, and later participated in a number of surrealist exhibitions, including the London International Surrealist Exhibition (New Burlington Gallery) and Exposition surréaliste d'Objets (Charles Ratton Gallery, Paris), both in 1936. In 1934, she published a short polemic essay, Les Paris sont Ouverts, and in 1935 took part in the founding of the left-wing group Contre Attaque, alongside André Breton and Georges Bataille.
Growing Concerns on KUT
2. Upon proof of claim that you know what a ‘person’ actually is, legally speaking.
One facet I’ve ignored is the value of having dominant media figures to promote culture. There have been numerous stories, fiction and non-fiction, that involve unfamiliar surroundings and struggles while there is an initial clash of cultures, both of which eventually see common ground. It’s the kind of story that helps bridge East and West cultures.
It's all well and good to be worrying about teenagers doing drugs, but stoned teenagers are amusing, at least. They ride their skateboards around, and then trip and fall in front of me, which sets me up nicely to say witty things like, "I always wanted men to fall at my feet, but you're a bit young." They cannot appreciate my marvelous and clever repartee, but it's hard to get a good audience. You get what you pay for.
Only two more so ease up on the scratching…
Nursing her wrath to keep it warm.
2013: Will be bred to Misremembered
Happy Thanksgiving to all and enjoy your football weekend !
3. Blame It On The Priests
I am loveless, spray painting hearts
If you feel a hand, guiding you along when the path seems wrong, it will be me. –Brother Bear 2
Dave takes the lead vocals on this song (although Ray gets two lines in the bridge), and he sounds great. There's something about the timbre of his voice that I just love. When I first heard The White Stripes, I thought, "Wow, this guy sounds like Dave Davies!"
it was always dinosaurs.
We also have little geckos that live all over the house. Arthur Dent delights in them and points and babbles every time he spots one. The rest of us enjoy them as well. I say, as long as they promise to enjoy the all-you-can-eat mosquito buffet our house offers, they are more than welcome to stay.
What does he care.
From the farm holiday italy pompei and most innovative and secluded Italy hotels are located in Italy. The notary actually has more duties than is normally associated with a lake view, private terrace, cellar and covered car parking space sold for 475,000 euros last year. A small two-bedroom apartments in Italy during your visit to St Mark's Basilica, Correr Museum, Mocenigo Palace, Rialto Bridge, and the farm holiday italy pompei a monarch until 1946, when a republic was developed.
Listen! you hear the grating roar
Crafters Digital Art Center!! An AWESOME site!!
Saute the red onion and red pepper in a skillet with some olive oil. Once cooked down and the onions are translucent, transfer to a slow-cooker casserole dish. Stir in the peeled, whole onions, seitan, seasonings, wine, and wine vinegar. Stir and cover and cook on high heat. Check ocassionally and add vegetable broth if it starts to thicken and stick to the casserole. Cook for 4-5 hours on high heat in crock-pot. Serve with a rice or a potato dish.
He chose a medium and a small. A medium means that you can get a medium toy, and a small means that you can get a small toy. If you get two mediums, you may upgrade to a large toy. The carnie said that a medium plus a small doesn't upgrade, so she was only going to give us a medium toy, but I told him that he technically got a medium and a small, so she let him get two toys. He dropped his blue dolphin back behind them, but we grabbed it before leaving. All in all, it was a pretty fun day. Unfortunately, Witten DID NOT want to nap in the car, so he screamed most of the way home. That was not the happy end that would would have hoped for, but after all, he was tired from having so much fun!
Why he is called Son of Man and why he calls himself Father is because he wants to make a difference between God and Jesus. Because if He called himself God among humans, people will think he’s crazy. Thinking this through is not that Hard so , yeah if any further questions then i will gladly discuss.
Drink/eat/gum/cheese stick/ham/meat/hot dog/candy/noodles/broccoli/apple juice
Slow it down.
1. Do you think Spirit-Link Totem filled the gap as our answer to a healing cooldown? Why or why not?
I started my digi site in December 09 after being blogging for 1 yr. I studied Graphic Design and photography and now work for the NHS as a photographer.
I hope I haven't confused my blog? I know I don't post
I am surprised that we are still friends. Maybe she pities me :-)
"Revolution! The Atlantic World Reborn" opens this Friday, Nov. 11, as the first exhibit in NYHS's newly renovated building at 170 Central Park West. It will be on display until April 15, 2012, when it will travel to venues in the UK and France.
I say, follow your bliss and don't be afraid,
4. Believers enter a spiritual kingdom of Christ when they are born again (Col. 1:13).
The worst thing is that all this focus on the weight of individuals is distracting us from the systemic issue of lack of access. Many people do not have access to the healthy foods that they would choose to eat -including foods that are not genetically modified or full of hormones or government subsidized high fructose corn syrup. Many people do not have access to safe movement options that they enjoy, or to affordable evidence-based health care. But as long as we focus on little Johnny’s BMI, we don’t have to address the real problems here and we can just keep shaming and blaming fat kids and adults and misinforming them and everyone else about the odds of becoming permanently thin.
3. Store bought cans and foods have a much shorter shelf life and must be vigorously rotated.
But we have chosen to accept each other the best we can for exactly who we are. (And learning, over the past nineteen years—we dated about eighteen months before marrying—that we’re kind of polar opposites but can OPT to make this work between us. And those lovely moments I peak? Those are the payoff for hanging tough through the times that feel tougher.
Here is my plea to the DVR gods: Figure this shit out and stop ruining my life. Football is the longest relationship I've ever been in. If you keep fucking it in the ass like this, I'm going to have to discard it like a cheap overused whore.
totally writing this from ethiopia, which is thrilling beyond words! i'm actually ducked into the lobby of a 4-star hotel near our (very kind) friend's home where we're staying, sitting next to 2 chinese guys playing games on their laptops. it's pretty par for the course of being in an african capital city that you perch yourself on poofy armchairs and buy a tea so you can use the rare internet connection. (or in the case of niamey, ali and i would duck into the 4 star hotels to feel the reprieve of air conditioning in 130 degree weather... aaaah....)
The NEWS.
You look down
The first sequence has the killers leaving their suits and ending up in casual clothes. This is considered so key to the movie, that the change of clothes sequence is moved to the very end.
Refreshments will be served.
No grown up person being by,
At this point, we must pause and ask – why all these controls? What exactly are they planning for us? The unpalatable truth is that this is all by design. Foreigners from continental Africa are, with the explicit blessing, and by invitation, flooding into South Africa to join the feeding frenzy on the carcass of the white minority. They are annexing our land and expropriating our birth right. The ANC has taken our collective white body, driven stakes into the ground, and have tied us down to it, directly in the path of a marching colony of army ants. By removing our civil defences, they are dripping honey over this prostrate body, and the ants are arriving. First, a small handful. Then fifty, a hundred, three hundred. Soon, we will be covered with thousands of hungry, flesh-devouring ants. The 350 000 people murdered in the past ten years represents a section of our collective body which is one arm completely nibbled away, from the elbow downwards. Yet the immigrant ant armies keep coming. They are now unstoppable.
Second Doctor era
Instead he kissed her. There was no fireworks. But bombs going off. Big explosions in the distant and a faint, but unmistakable smell of dynamite. Imagined body parts getting torn into fragments.
No one on Earth had read her whole food blog. Rachel didn't think anyone had ever, in her entire life, showed that much interest in something she had done.
And off I went. After carrying my bike up the stairs to the place de la Madeleine, I climbed on and started pedaling down the cobblestones of rue Royale, in Paris traffic. Me? Me.
Dash has his own plans, and secrets, that entwine Felicita and her new friend, the vampire Jannik. As Felicita gets drawn deeper into Dash's plotting, she struggles with trusting him. Does he care for her or is he using her to get his way? As the story progresses, things get more convoluted and enemies stay firmly in gray areas. You never know who to trust in this ragtag group of street kids, which is part of the fun of the novel. I thought the plot went kind of crazy all over the place during the climax, and I wasn't satisfied that Felicita found true happiness the way I wanted, but it was definitely a fun journey.
If all you do is chase orders and money then be sure that at some point your reputation will become tarnished and you will send out a clear message to the market – basically, you don’t care. Focusing on “what you are in service of….” will send a clear message to customers, you want to do a great job. They will then go on and tell all their mates, just how good you are!
1/22: P4 @ 195.7
Based on input from the community, and the monitoring of social conversations within it and outside it, Intuit now performs annual product updates and regular improvements to its TurboTax product based on comments and suggestions from its highly-engaged community members.
* If using thicker batting I trim a triangle off each corner of the block so there is less bulk at this area where I'm joining the blocks.
Republican representatives hold themselves up as following the will of the people. All but five of the 234 Republicans present in the chamber at the time voted down the “Buffett Rule,” which would raise taxes on millionaires despite the nearly three-fourths of people in this country who want these taxes raised so that millionaires don’t pay a lower rate than those who make much less than they do. At the same time more anti-choice bills are wending their way through House committees, not only the Judiciary but also the Energy and Commerce. Those will show up in the 51 days that the House has left to meet this year.
3) Blog about this giveaway and make sure to include a link back!
So I'm going to spend the evening with my stitch ripper and perhaps some knitting and a mug of hot chocolate. And I'm not going to be grumpy about it, because I am picking my battles! And maybe tomorrow after I've handed those essays in, I'll have another go at the neckline.
1 lb. small radishes (2 to 2 ½ dozen)
I'm jumping in with both feet so to speak and I'm getting crunchier by the minute! What's the deal? I'll tell you.
Are you looking for a Roofer? A Carpenter? A mechanic? Ask your local Bartender, if they don’t know or recommend one then either they are new or just don’t have the networking capabilities that most do. Meaning if I need someone to fix my plumbing i know who to call. If I need someone to replace my hardwood floor than I have the contractors name and number. If I need a mechanic to fix my car I have his info. Need a Banker? Then I have his info as well.
WY3711 French Saison
Obviously there is no better person to play the part than Johnny Depp and no better director than Tim Burton to take on this film.
I did another hat, from the same Eco Duo yarn (Baby alpaca + Merino) for my mom, and another one with lines of 2 colors of the same yarn that came out really small so I gave it to a friend.
Every now and again I hear it. ‘It’ is the sound of a car driving by while someone speaks through a low quality PA system. I catch a 3second snippet, but can barely make out any of what’s said. I guess there’s an election around the corner.
The Pope has challenged world leaders by claiming that the people of the world already recognize the absolute authority of Rome because they observe the Sunday Sabbath that was ordered by the Pope in the Council of Laodicea (A.D. 364). The original Ten Commandments given Moses by God ordered that we should: Remember the Sabbath day, to keep it Holy. Six days shalt thou labor, and do all thy work: but the seventh day is the Sabbath of the Lord thy God; in
I’m not one to get ill, built with the immune system of a biological tank, so the early-morning shock to the system today was something of a surprise. I’ll spare you the details, but needless to say it isn’t something I’ve encountered for a while.
What’s all this then? Another tale?
I’m never short of ideas for stories, anything can start my imagination going, an overheard comment, a line from a song, a newspaper article, people going about their daily lives, they’re all fodder for my over-active mind. And once I get an idea I run with it to see just where it will take me, I don’t put any restrictions or barriers on it I just go with the flow, writing away whatever comes into my head. The trouble is, sometimes I’ve got so carried away with the idea that I’ve forgotten to think whether I’ve got my facts right. I used to write for the Rainbow comic – remember the Rainbow TV programme with Bungle, Zippy and George back in the 80’s? Zippy was a hand puppet, a fact I completely forget when I had this wonderful idea for a comic strip set in a shoe shop where Zippy was trying on lots of shoes. I can’t remember what happened in the actual story but I can remember my editor phoning me up and saying “Karen, that’s a great story but there’s one problem...Zippy
Tiresome and agile moving with speed
James W. Douglass in his documented book, JFK and the Unspeakable, attributes the assassination of President John F. Kennedy to the CIA, Joint Chiefs of Staff, and Secret Service. Douglas reports that these powerful government institutions were concerned by Kennedy’s refusal to approve Operation Northwoods, to back the CIA’s invasion of Cuba, and to confront the Soviets militarily over the Cuban missile crisis and by Kennedy’s plans to end US military intervention in Vietnam. JFK also told his brother Robert that after his re-election he was going to break the CIA into a thousand pieces.
Had just stabbed him
For I have been to NY Comic Con 2011. I have breathed the same air as some of the most enthusiastic comic book, graphic novel, video game, anime, movie, and television geeks and nerds the world over. I have been lost inside the glorious glass behemoth known as the Javits Center.
The one place however that I should NOT be screwing up on is what to feed my kids to keep them from getting sick. The last few weeks have been a horrible mix of birthday parties and bad decisions on my part. I had been doing pretty well on keeping an eye on Ashley's carbs and sugars and while her blood sugar was still slightly elevated in the mornings it wasn't something to panic about yet. Her morning fasting levels were maintaining in the 110-115 range and she was feeling pretty good.
I’ve been seeing and hearing a lot about Neil Gaiman recently so I did some more digging into what he’s all about and discovered that he has a couple of books of his that are fairly critically acclaimed and fit in with my genres of choice. I figure adding him to the reading list is a pretty good idea. As for Tad Williams, he’s one of those authors who I’ve seen on the bookshelves at bookstores and have always thought about picking up his books. I never found the time previously but the more I read about the Otherworld and Shadowmarch books the more I think I might like them, so onto the list they go as well.
25ml lemon + lime juice
get the jingle out of our heads. Apologies to those readers who find the stinky, slinky Mustela putorius furo their equal or that Ferrets are worthy of being a domesticated pet. I should add that there was a GOLD MINE of images available featuring COSTUMED Ferrets -JUST SAYING.
I will be back soon, I hope :)
-incomplete evacuation more than 25% of the time
He makes me smile.
1 – 14 ounce can sweetened condensed milk
So, camera found and stresses easing, I hope to be back soon. Have I read that before somewhere?! xx
Dobkin on personal blogs: "we all have to accept... that we're really not that interesting"
Now, kindergarteners have to get to school exactly between 8:10 and
The sentiment is from the same PB stamp sheet.
Despite the gravity of his offences and the fact that he is the ringleader of the online vice ring, the state media chose to shift public attention to his clients to downplay his involvement leading some to speculate if he is a ‘white horse’ related to the ruling elite with some unverified rumors circulating in cyberspace that his mother is related to a public figure from a political party in Singapore.
Over the years I've learned to totally lighten up on the apparel when traveling.
Travis Duggins: I don’t know anything about his costume. I have not seen this play.
Slipping in like thieves, thoughts unrelated to their conversation obscured the flash that might have been brilliant.
Helping students create positive digital footprints
“Thank you, Jesus for the thunder. Bring on the rain! Thank you, Jesus, for controlling the fires with the rain You sent. Send more!
If it has been ten years, since May 2002, then that further revises the creation tale told by Markowitz in a New Yorker profile, that he picked up the phone in the fall of 2002 to tell Ratner the Nets were up for sale.
Be active in our forum group
By not engaging people in high quality discussion through asking high quality questions, I will end up misunderstanding everyone and being misunderstood.
To create this effect you will need a Copic Airbrush System or Compressor, Gloss Card (I have used X-press It Inkjet Film), three Copic Markers (I have used three from the same colour family), Mist It filled with Colourless Blender Solution (not pictured) and a silhouette stamp (I have used 'Blush' by Penny Black).
The Summer Beauty Festival runs from the 1st – 25th May so don’t forget to run over and indulge yourself!
Speaking with colleagues of Mrs. BD about the merits of the second amendment I was dumbfounded to find out not only had they concealed firearm licenses - but were “carrying” and did so in a nonchalant manner akin to that I would relate to having my mobile phone on my possession.
And I know that beast well.
I don’t have a paper fetich and truth be told, I have no more room for another book in my book case (and no room for another bookcase) any slots I have free I’m saving for Brian Wood’s amazing DMZ series. (Oh! yeah!)
The Top Five Regrets of the Dying: A Life Transformed by the Dearly Departed gives hope for a better world. Bronnie’s delightful memoir is a courageous, life-changing book that will leave you feeling more compassionate and inspired to live the life you are truly here to live. View here: regrets-of-the-dying-brownie-ware
I am the genie of the laptop.
Anything Christmassy Goes!
As a nominee, I am to list seven idiosyncrasies of myself that my followers most likely do not know. Don’t you judge me, now.
Wrestle with a language and strange sounds
Bican also recalled how a group of 50 or so workers followed them to the station and asked if there was any problem. Bican replied there wasn’t and one of the workers said, ‘that’s okay otherwise we would have gone on strike.’ Bican was well aware of the situation he was in. Had he resisted he would have gotten 20 years in prison.
Tragic, no? You can see here why the little lambs find their world so very dull.
Through the pathways of man
After a brief "do-we-or-don't-we" discussion, we got on the plane armed with a stack of Air France barf bags. The flight attendants were kind and attentive. The other passengers were also kind, and stopped to ask how the Loosh was doing on their way to the john. His fever kicked in immediately after the plane wheels left the runway, and he passed out cold and slept the whole way to Prague with his head in my lap.
I'll chatter aimlessly anyway.
We also take our nourishment from a passel of poets ~ Ted Kooser, Mary Oliver, Wendell Berry, Naomi Shihab Nye, William Carlos Williams, Maxine Kumin, Stanley Kunitz, Nikki Giovani, Donald Hall, Lucille Clifton, e e cummings, Maya Angelou, Billy Collins, Gwendolyn Brooks…. just to name a few.
But really, what the heck? My subconscious is a weird place.
BTW – bring the wheelchair
“Real Heroes” presents for your consideration the New York Initiative, a group of real-life superheroes who have offered their services to protect working girls.
This weekend I saw video on YouTube about the New Zealand Maori HAKA. It's a battlefield dance of sorts that is meant to intimidate the opponent. They still use it at the beginning of sports games although I found videos of the Army, Navy, and a police station doing it.
For its new book, filled with stories about the dangers of gang life, ARISE Foundation interviewed several incarcerated young gang members about their experiences.
In that respect, no other type of observance will do.
Dang, I got that punctuation all wrong - the question mark is in the wrong place. I should have written that as "Is it immoral to kill Bioethicists?"
And, what was I supposed to do? Pull a Chris Farley and shout “lay off me, I’m starving” across the restaurant? Of course not. Being adverse to any public scenes, I put up with the humiliation as I have several times before. My small, impotent protest was a reduction in tip.
Before we all start thinking of Hugh Grant, let me say than I am going to focus on the novel for this post. I love Nick Hornby because even if his prose is nothing extraordinary he tells really original stories with very peculiar characters that I really enjoy. About a boy is one of my favorites because it is sweet and leaves you with a bit of faith in humanity and the world.
"Yes. He trespassed." It took the Wilder a long moment's pause to find that last word. It continued, "If you do not go back, I must arrest you as well."
He looks at me, unsure about my intentions. Should I tell him that this will make me famous? That his story will bring my name up from the depths of literary obscurity? I wait for his reply. I hope he doesn’t decline. Finally, I see his face change slightly and he nods in agreement.
E- An actor in that class will take 0% of the normal damage when attacked with the selected element.
This was a stare that I had become used to over the months however this time it’s different. I feel my blood run cold as a new serge of panic racks over my body. He begins pushing my body forward as my hips come in contact with the cold wood of the banister. I let out a strangled cry as he leans in and whispers with calmness, “You thought you could leave me, Ann.” he grins against my skin as I wait for him to continue, but it he doesn’t. His grip on my neck begins to tighten and I know that means he’s lifting me again; I have done this far too many times before. I begin to claw at his skin, every inch of me throbbing in pain, hoping that he might loosen his grip long enough for me to clamber away. He’s far too determined at this point and I know that this will end badly. It’s almost calming to know that this, all of this pain and suffering, would be over in a matter of minutes or seconds; for I can see that look in his eye, the one that says, “You pushed me too far this time.” However in that second, I saw my death, I hated myself for giving up on everything that I had been fighting for.
The point I’m trying to make, I suppose, is that I’ve been doing this for a very long time, and until now I could probably count the number of people to have read any single piece of my writing, by lining up the condiments in my kitchen cupboards. Even using my own digits, I’m pretty sure I wouldn’t have to remove any footwear. And yet, add a cute 5 year old girl, and a web designer with a pool of facebook buddies, and it’s “Cat falling off washing machine” syndrome all over again. A real writer would be heading for the bathroom with a pair of wire cutters and a Gillette Fusion by now.
Just take my hand and please be my spouse.
He knew I was grounded before I had even issued the SOS and delivered in the most literal way. I do not know what the future holds but I am certain of who holds the future.
would be hand Sanitizer followed by Soap and Water for
All in all these two have become my new lip saving Dream Team, coupled with my new MAC lippy in Morange (more on that later) I think I’ve found a whole new lip look.
When we stopped getting any financial help from the label to keep our momentum going, Jay and I became disheartened. However, this didn’t stop us from writing and recording music. In fact, the four bonus tracks on the Now Sounds reissue come from this period after we made the decision to leave Decca. We were nominated for a NARAS (Grammy) in 1969 - and had we stuck it out, Bill Downer later told us we could have made another album. “Orfeon” MCA label in Mexico did do another pressing of the album, which was titled Caminando Por La Sexto Avenida (Sixth Avenue Stroll). But Jay was offered a great opportunity with a company that was training him for a trading position on the exchange on Wall Street. He loved this job and became very skilled, so his decision to go another direction probably did become the broken link to a performing future for us. Jay excelled in this profession, working many years for Merrill Lynch and becoming one of the Vice Presidents.
to paint them with hope and love.
as well as creamy chocolate cupcakes for the two sitters
“Midnight felt too much of a writing exercise to be really scary”
HARRISON J, ABBOTT P. Vaccination against influenza: UK health care workers not on-message. Occup Med 2002; 52: 277-279.
I took a bunch of pictures of Ree as she answered questions from the audience. She took a couple of pictures of the crowd before starting to take questions. I was in the third row of chairs from the podium. Maybe, if she posts the pictures on her blog I will see myself. :)
But my recurring fear is that they will go for somebody horrible with a nice line in “Let me take you away from all this”.
5. Sarah Paulson, Martha Marcy May Marlene – It’s not as showy a role as those of her costars but Paulson really grounds the movie. While other characters are brainwashed cult members, charismatic cult leaders, or impatient husbands, Paulson plays the woman in the middle trying to make sense of it all.
Do I need to toggle my monitor back and forth between work and personal PCs? No.
Jinny notes, “As parents, we can brush a nostalgic patina over our childhood stories, playing up our successes and omitting the struggles. When our kids do have a problem, they wonder why they are struggling when we never did.”
Favorite Colour~ Deep red and black.
First: The President of the Republic shall charge the nominee of the largest Council of Representatives bloc with the formation of the Council of Ministers within fifteen days from the date of the election of the President of the Republic.
fingertip steps that salute me
2. Attitude
It is also allowed for the parents to allow others to name the child, since our Prophet (peace and blessings be upon him) used to name some of the children of his Companions.
It's aimed mainly at the aforementioned YouTube audience, but I'd welcome questions from blog readers as well! My YouTube channel: Catzie690
